





Norway’s Rasmussen buys USD38m stake in Ice/Net 1 group



























Sign In
Purchase
About
Press
CommsUpdate





Research Services
Custom Research
Telecom Maps
Telecom Resources





Home > Research Services > CommsUpdate


Norway’s Rasmussen buys USD38m stake in Ice/Net 1 group
 3 Jun 2015

DenmarkNorwaySweden


Norwegian shipping group Rasmussen has invested NOK300 million (USD37.98 million) in purchasing a 29.5% stake in AINMT Holdings, the parent of wireless broadband network operators Ice.net (Norway), Net 1 Denmark and Net 1 Sweden, Norwegian national broadcaster NRK reports on its website. CEO of the investing company, Dag Rasmussen, was quoted as saying that the aim is to make Ice into Norway’s third largest operator. NRK adds that other local investors to take smaller stakes in AINMT include Pareto (NOK67 million), Commenda (NOK53 million), Leif Hubert (NOK25 million) and Bjarne Skeie (NOK10 million).
In April 2015 AINMT announced on its website the successful completion of a share issue worth USD82.5 million to selected institutional and professional investors, with the aim of investing the proceeds back into the company’s triple-country operations.
February 2015 saw some important developments for AINMT in Norway, as Ice.net secured a deal to acquire certain mobile assets of Tele2/Network Norway including cellular customers, as a by-product of TeliaSonera’s (NetCom’s) takeover of Tele2 Norway. Simultaneously Ice.net signed a national roaming agreement with GSM/W-CDMA/LTE network operator NetCom. Meanwhile, Ice.net – which currently operates nationwide wireless broadband services based on CDMA-450 technology – is expected to launch 4G LTE-450 services in Q3 2015, with Danish and Swedish LTE-450 launches expected to follow in due course, TeleGeography’s GlobalComms Database notes.
AINMT Holdings is majority controlled by US-based Access Industries.

Denmark, Norway, Sweden,ice.net (incl. Ice Communications Norge), Net 1 Denmark (formerly Ice.net), Net 1 Sweden, Corporate/Financial, Mergers/Acquisitions







Subscribe




Email Address 













Feedback
Have feedback, corrections, or story ideas? Send them to editors@commsupdate.com.



Browse Past Issues



Filter
Filter CommsUpdate by the following categories or use the search.

Wireless
LTE
5G
MVNO
M2M/IoT
Broadband
IPTV
WiMAX
Submarine
Wireline
VoIP
Mergers/Acquisitions
Corporate/Financial



Search
Visit our help page information on performing advanced searches, including how to restrict the results by country or company.









Advertise
CommsUpdate is an outstanding advertising venue for companies seeking to reach:

International carriers
Wholesale service providers
Equipment and software vendors
Telecom investors
Regulators

Learn more about advertising on CommsUpdate.


Share




Tweet











Research Services
Custom Research
Telecom Maps
Telecom Resources




CommsUpdate
Press
About
Purchase
Sign In




TeleGeography
A Division of PriMetrica, Inc.

Washington D.C. / 
					San Diego / 
					Exeter / 
					Singapore


work
					U.S. East Coast: +1 (202) 741 0020


work
					U.S. West Coast: +1 (760) 651 0030


work
					U.K.: +44 (0) 1392 493626


work
					Singapore: +65 6534 9685

sales@telegeography.com

© Copyright 2017 PriMetrica, Inc.
All Rights Reserved.










Bectochem,Ankleshwar,Pune,manufacturers of pharmaceutical machineries,Coaters,RMG,Rapid Mixer Granulator,Paste Kettle,Fluid Bed Dryer,Fluid Bed Processor,FBD,FBP,Contained Granulation,Granulation,Containment

































 


About Us
Product Line 
 Pharmaceutical

 Classification
Solid Dosages 
Classification
 VibroSifter 
Milling
 Co-mill
Multimill
Fitzmill 
Binder Preparation
Granulation
Wet Granulation
HSMG
Planetary Mixer 
Dry Granulation
 Roll Compactor
Mixers
 Ribbon Mixer
Vertical Mixer 
 
Drying
 FBD
FBP 
Lubrication/Blending
Compression
Coating
 Conventional Coating Pan
Becoater 
CIP/WIP Systems
 Bin Wash System
CIP Skid 
 
Liquid & Ointment
Material Handling Devices
 Lifting & Positioning Units
Mobile Loader
Tipper
 
Containment
 Containment Basics
Rigid
API Isolators
Dispensing & Sampling
Reactor Charge
ANFD
Centrifuge
Filtration & Drying
Carboys Handling
API Isolator Line
 Formulation Isolators
 Sterility Test
Granulation
Single Pot Processor
Tablet Compression
Tablet Coater
QC & IPQC
Milling & Sieving
Packoff
Dedustor/Metal Detector
 High Containment Granulation Line
Services
 Flexible
Hect Tech GMBH
Hospital Applications
 
API 
Tailor Made Equipments
Dryers
Filters
Powder Processing
Classification
 VibroSifter
Milling
 Co-mill
Multimill
Fitzmill
Dry Granulation
 Roll Compactor
Mixers
 Ribbon Mixer
Vertical Mixer
 
Lubrication
Vacuum Transfer System
 Proclean Conveyor by Hecht
Conventional Powder Transfer System
Speciality Discharge Systems
 Sterivalve
Q-Dos

  
Food & Cosmetics   
Associates & Alliances
Associates Worldwide 
Channel Partners 
 Bector Hecht
CSP
Sterivalve
Fitzpatrick
LÃ¶dige Process Technology  
Participations
Clientele
Career
Enquiry
Download Section
Contact  Us




















Bectochem Organics Profile
        To view Corporate Video click here...




 



 






 




 

 
                        International Associations
 

 

   

 



 








   
          To download Corporate Profile click here...
             




All rights reserved Â© Bectochem.                                                                                    Design By RED ANT Design Studio.





 


AINMT | Wireless broadband































| Menu




          					About AINMT
				

          					Investor Relations
				

          					News & Media
				

          					Norway
				

          					Sweden & Denmark
				

          					International
				






About AINMT




About ourcompany
Ourhistory
Corporatestructure
Group executive management
Board ofdirectors





        About ourcompany
      


AINMT is an international telecommunications company. Its focus is wireless data communication services, the fastest growing business segment within the telecom sector. Its unique business model, with focus on low frequency bands, allows the company to offer wireless broadband to large geographical areas while maintaining an effective network infrastructure.Low frequencies have long reach and require fewer base stations to cover large areas. This is a perfect match for rural districts, areas with varied topography and markets with underdeveloped telecommunication infrastructure. Altogether, this allows for high quality wireless data communication at a very low cost per bit. In Norway, where the company owns higher frequency bands, we also offer a full range of mobile services without having legacy networks to maintain and support.Today, AINMT has license coverage to reach 380 million people worldwide. The company is already well established in Scandinavia and has developed partnerships in Indonesia and the Philippines. It is actively pursuing international expansion opportunities, aiming to satisfy the pent-up demand for internet access and data consumption in developing countries.AINMT's majority owner is Access Industries, a privately held industrial group with long-term holdings worldwide. Its industrial focus spans four sectors: naural resources and chemicals; media and telecommunications; technology and e-commerce; and real estate.
























Executive Management Team




JD Fouchard
Chief ExecutiveOfficer

JD Fouchard is the CEO of AINMT, a position he assumed in June 2011. He was previously a member of Access Industries’ Media and Communications team. He played a leading role in the acquisition of the AINMT group by Access Industries and has been a board member/director since the acquisition in 2009.Mr. Fouchard joined Access Industries in June 2007 from UBS’s Telecom Investment Banking Group where he worked on numerous transactions involving Vodafone.Prior to UBS, Mr. Fouchard was with Morgan Stanley Capital Partners where he was an analyst within the European Leverage Buyout Group, a USD 3.3 billion fund.He is a dual Haitian/Swiss national fluent in French, English, Spanish, German and Creole. He is a graduate of ESCP-EAP European School of Management and Albert Ludwigs University in Freiburg Germany.Mr. Fouchard is a director of AINMT Holdings AB, AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS, Ice Communciation Norge AS, Ice Norge AS, Netett Sverige AB, Ice Danmark ApS and AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AB.




Johan Michelsen
Deputy CEO

Johan Michelsen has worked with the telecom sector at various investment banks since 1999. From 2001 to 2005 he was rated as the best telecom equity analyst in Norway before moving on to found a merger and acquisition advisor named Medici Corporate. Medici completed EUR 3bn in deals, a large share of these within the telecom secor. Medici was acquired in 2009 by Pareto Securities where he was a partner until December 2012 and then joined AINMT in January 2013. From 2013 to 2017 he held the role as CFO of AINMT, before assuming the role as deputy CEO in May 2017.Mr Michelsen is a Norwegian citizen. He has a masters degree from the BI Norwegian Business School and started his career at the Boston Consulting Group in Stockholm.Mr Michelsen is a director of AINMT AS, AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS, Ice Communciation Norge AS and Ice Norge AS.




Murat Erden
Chief Financial Officer

Murat Erden is the CFO of AINMT, a role he assumed in May 2017. Mr Erden has extensive experience from the international telecommunication and financial services industries. He was previously the Group CFO of NYSE-listed Turkcell. In addition to his role as Group CFO, Mr Erden held number of senior positions during his 15 years in Turkcell, both as non-executive board member at international joint ventures and Group companies, and as Group Director of Treasury, Risk Management and Procurement. He also founded and sponsored the Consumer Finance Company for Turkcell. He has also managed his consultancy firm in London, UK.Mr Erden is a London Business School Alumni and holds an MBA from San Diego State University, USA.




Gösta Kallner
Chief TechnologyOfficer

Gösta Kallner joined the company in 2005 and has more than 25 years’ experience in the telecom industry. Gösta has been involved in numerous network deployments and operations across Europe, Asia and America with various global telecom operators and equipment suppliers.Gösta is a director of Netett Sverige AB and AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AB.




Jean-Marc Engels
CHIEF TRANSFORMATION& PROCUREMENT OFFICER

Jean-Marc Engels has been the CTPO for AINMT’s Scandinavian operation since 2013. Jean-Marc Engels has more than 25 years’ experience in the international telecommunication industry, and has worked with start-ups as well as with larger equipment vendors and operators. Jean-Marc is specialized in telecom networks in general - strategy, sourcing, modernizing, building, operating and selling.Prior to AINMT, Jean-Marc worked as executive interim manager, focusing on international expansions, for start-ups such as ISCO Intl. and Accanto Systems. Before 2011, Jean-Marc held several executive positions within Ericsson in Belgium, Japan, China and other countries.




Anders Koch
Group FinancialController

Anders Koch is the group financial controller for the AINMT Group. Anders joined AINMT in September 2010 as group financial controller for the AINMT Scandinavian business. Prior to AINMT, Anders was an Authorized Public Accountant and Senior Manager with PwC Sweden.Anders is a director of Netett Sverige AB, Ice Danmark ApS and AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AB




Eivind Helgaker
Managing directorNorway

Eivind Helgaker is the managing director of ice.net in Norway, a role he assumed in 2009.Before joining ice.net, Helgaker was the country manager for CANAL+ Norway. Prior to this he spent seven years in various management roles at Tele2 in Norway and Holland, including his position in the Norwegian management group as the marketing director for Tele2 Norway.Mr. Helgaker is a master of science in marketing from the BI Norwegian School of Management.He is a member of the board of Ice Communication Norge AS and Ice Norge AS.




Linus Jönsson
Managing directorSweden

Linus Jönsson is the managing director of Net1 Sweden, a position he assumed in October 2012.Mr. Jönsson joined Net1 Sweden from Netgear International, where he worked as managing director of the EMEA region.Prior to Netgear, Mr. Jönsson was with 3Com Corp, where he was the Nordic regional manager.During his career, Mr. Jönsson has held leaderships roles in sales and marketing in international markets as well as spending 14 years in general management. He holds a diploma in marketing and economics.




René  Kappelgård
Managing directorDenmark

René Kappelgård is the managing director of Net1 in Denmark and also holds the role as chief operating officer for Net1’s Swedish operation.Mr. Kappelgård, who holds an Masters degree from University of Copenhagen, joined Net1 in 2010.He has held various positions in the Danish telecommunication industry since 1999.




Larry Ridwan
Managing directorIndonesia

Larry Ridwan is the CEO of PT.Sampoerna Telekomunikasi Indonesia (STI). Larry joined STI in 2015 bringing cross functional experiences in strategy, business planning, product development, marketing and sales.Prior to STI, Larry has been involved in many different consumer retail related businesses. In telecom specifically, he was CFO for PT.First Media Tbk, and he was also responsible for the commercial launch of the first 4G mobile operator in Indonesia, Bolt Super4G. From 2001 to 2010, Larry worked for Citibank N.A. where he held several high level management positions related to consumer banking, consumer finance and credit cards.




Tirso D. Antiporda Jr
Managing directorPhilippines

Tirso D. Antiporda, Jr. has had a successful track record in banking as well as the commercial-industrial sector. His past experiences in banking includes being President & CEO of a Philippine commercial bank for 10 years; and subsequently as Chairman & CEO of a major universal bank. He was at that time also concurrently Chairman & CEO of a large insurance company affiliated to the universal bank.In the commercial-industrial sector, his record included a stint as President & CEO of a conglomerate engaged in telecommunications, shipping, airport services, air freight and travel. He was also formerly President & CEO of the Philippines’ largest oleo-chemical company. Prior to joining Broadband Everywhere Corporation, he was President and CEO of Textron Corporation, a company engaged in providing wireless networking and broadband services to the corporate sector.













Members of the Board of Directors





Stan Miller
Chairman ofthe Board

Stan Miller has over 25 years’ experience in the start-up, turnaround and running of companies in the both the telecommunication and (pay) TV industries.He is currently an investor in, and a member of the board of, MTS Russia, Chairman of AINMT, Managing Director of Leaderman N.V. and advisor to leading consulting and private equity funds in the TMT space globally.From June 2006 until February 2010, Stan Miller was a member of the board of Royal KPN and CEO of its Mobile International Business. He was also responsible for the M&A division at KPN. He served as Chairman of E-Plus and BASE




JD Fouchard
Chief ExecutiveOfficer

JD Fouchard is the CEO of AINMT, a position he assumed in June 2011. He was previously a member of Access Industries’ Media and Communications team. He played a leading role in the acquisition of the AINMT group by Access Industries and has been a board member/director since the acquisition in 2009.Mr. Fouchard joined Access Industries in June 2007 from UBS’s Telecom Investment Banking Group where he worked on numerous transactions involving Vodafone.Prior to UBS, Mr. Fouchard was with Morgan Stanley Capital Partners where he was an analyst within the European Leverage Buyout Group, a USD 3.3 billion fund.He is a dual Haitian/Swiss national fluent in French, English, Spanish, German and Creole. He is a graduate of ESCP-EAP European School of Management and Albert Ludwigs University in Freiburg Germany.Mr. Fouchard is a director of AINMT Holdings AB, AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS, Ice Communciation Norge AS, Ice Norge AS, Netett Sverige AB, Ice Danmark ApS and AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AB.




Hans-Holger Albrecht
Non-ExecutiveDirector

Hans-Holger Albrecht is CEO of Deezer, one of the largest music streaming services worldwide. Deezer offers more than 35 million tracks in over 180 countries to currently more than 16 million active monthly users. Prior to this Albrecht was President and CEO of Millicom International, the international telecom and media group, operating in more than 16 countries in Latin America and Africa. Before this, Albrecht was President and CEO at Modern Times Group MTG AB. Before joining MTG, Albrecht worked for Luxembourg-based media group CLT, where he was responsible for all television activities and business development in Germany and Eastern Europe. Albrecht has studied at the University of Freiburg in German and received a Master of Laws degree (LLM) from the Ruhr University Bochum.




Thomas Harding
Non-ExecutiveDirector

Thomas Harding is a director on the board of AINMT Holdings. Mr Harding works with Jörg Mohaupt on media/online and telecoms investments at Access Industries. He previously headed-up Access Industries’ European legal function, after joining from Weil, Gotshal and Manges. He has an MA from the University of Cambridge and subsequently studied at City University (law) and London Business School (finance). He is also a director of Perform Group Limited, Channel 10 TV and Westwing Group GmbH, as well as being an officer of Access Industries, Inc. and a trustee of The Blavatnik School of Government Foundation at the University of Oxford.




Trygve Lauvdal
Non-ExecutiveDirector

Trygve Lauvdal is a portfolio manager at RASMUSSENGRUPPEN AS, a position he assumed in November 2010. He has nine years of equity research experience from DnB, specializing in the technology sector from 2001 to 2008 and the industrial- and renewable energy sector from 2008 to 2010. Trygve is a Norwegian citizen and holds a PhD in engineering cybernetics from NTNU. He started his career at ABB in 1997. Mr Laudal is also a director of Avantor AS, B2 Holding AS and AINMT AS.




Jörg Mohaupt
Non-ExecutiveDirector

Jörg Mohaupt is a director on the board of AINMT Holdings and is also responsible for the media, online and telecom business at Access Industries, which he joined in May 2007. He was previously a Managing Director of Providence Equity Partners. Before joining Providence in 2004, he was an executive director at Morgan Stanley and Lehman Brothers in their TMT groups.Mr. Mohaupt has been actively involved in the media and telecommunications sector since 1992 and currently serves on the boards of AINMT AS, Deezer, Gettaxi Ltd, Perform Group Plc, Sentient Technologies, Songkick, ULE and Warner Music Group.




Ingvild Myhre
Non-ExecutiveDirector

Ingvild Myhre graduated from the Norwegian University of Science and Technology. She was previously President of the operator Network Norway. Under her leadership, the company grew from a startup to become one of Norway´s largest operators. Ingvild has previously held leading positions at Alcatel Norway (CEO), Telenor Mobil (CEO). Since 2009, she has worked as an entrepreneur and board member. Amongst others she has launched the mobile operator Chili Mobile, a new Norwegian low cost operator to offer mobile services in Telenor’s network.Ingvild is the chairman of the board of Ice Communication Norge AS and Ice Norge AS.




Jan Scherman
Non-ExecutiveDirector

Jan Scherman currently holds the positions as Head of business area TV at Aftonbladet, member of the board of the EQT-company IP Only as well as being a columnist with Svenska Dagbladet, daily Swedish newspaper. Previously he held the position as vice President of Bonnier Broadcasting, and has worked as a journalist and publicist throughout his career. Jan Scherman has been Deputy Managing Director/CEO for Bonnier’s Nordic Broadcasting since December 2011. Before that Jan was CEO of the TV4 Group between 2001 and 2011, Program Director of TV4 between 1997 and 2001, and Head of the Current Affairs department between 1992 and 1997.Mr. Scherman began his journalistic career at Östgöta Correspondenten (1971), Sveriges Radio (1972) and Sveriges Television (1978), where he was Head of the Aktuellt News department. Jan Scherman received the “Stora Journalistpriset” award in 1989 and the “Stockholm Media Award” in 2008.




Phil Hewinson
NON-EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR

Phil Hewinson is currently at Facebook, working in Product Partnerships, which informs Facebook's product strategy through strategic partnerships. Prior roles at Facebook included leading a team that redefined how mobile app developers monetised their apps and a partner engineer working with games developers around Europe.Before joining Facebook, Hewinson worked at Google where he managed complex technical projects between its most strategic partners in the mobile industry.  He was tech lead for Europe for the Galaxy Nexus launch and managed the global Nokia and Opera accounts. Hewinson has also worked for Microsoft and founded his own gaming company, Projected Games Ltd. He holds a first class honors degree in Computer Science from Cambridge University.














© 2017 AINMT Holdings AB


          					Terms of Use
				

          					Privacy Policy
				



Contact Us
info@ainmt.com


Receive our updates



Submit
































Agrinos Home | USA














 USA 

USA
Brazil
India
Southeast Asia
China
Ukraine






Search 








  






































Products

Our highly effective biological products use proprietary technology and unique formulations to deliver greater crop yields, higher crop quality and increased return on investment.
Learn More »






Science

Agrinos is rooted in science. Our proprietary technology platform delivers products that enhance highly diversified microbial communities, and our complex nutrient formulations are unmatched in the crop biologicals industry.
Learn More »



Featured Videos








            Impact of Agrinos' Innovative Biological Technology        


            Ry Wagner - CEO           











            Value Delivered by iNvigorate and B Sure        


            Patrick Hurt - Security Seed           





View more »








Company

To improve the productivity and sustainability of the twenty-first-century farmer, Agrinos is helping shape the future of modern agriculture.
Learn More »






























AINMT Holdings AB - Relationship Science
































































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              





























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





AINMT Holdings AB



Overview
In The News Executives & Employees Board of Directors Paths
Recent Transactions Transaction Advisors Investors



AINMT Holdings AB



 OVERVIEW



Date Founded


2008




Headquarters


Regeringsgatan 25, Stockholm 111 53




Industries


Wireless Telecommunications

Other Business & Consulting Services

Holding Companies

Cable, Satellite, and Radio Telecommunications

Electrical Products

Wholesale: Technology




Company Description


AINMT Holdings AB provides mobile broadband internet access and voice over internet protocol telephony. Its customers include police, ambulances, coast guard, and the Red Cross. The company was founded on December 2, 2008 and is headquartered in Stockholm, Sweden.




Website


http://www.ainmt.com






 In The News
          See more




PR Newswire
July 24, 2017





                        NII Holdings announces completion of $50 million investment by AINMT for 30% stake in Nextel Brazil                    





PR Newswire
June 6, 2017





                        NII Holdings and AINMT announce partnership to invest in Nextel Brazil's growth strategy                    





Thomson Reuters ONE
March 18, 2015





                        AINMT AS is considering to invest up to USD 150 million in equity in AINMT Holdings AB                    





PR Newswire
February 23, 2015





                        TD-LTE Network Market: $230 Billion Operator Service Revenue by 2020                    





PR Newswire
January 7, 2015





                        450 MHz Alliance Gains Two Key Members- Alcatel-Lucent and AINMT Holdings AB                    






 Executives & Employees



Jean Daniel Fouchard

Chief Executive Officer




Johan Michelsen

Chief Financial Officer





Gösta Kallner

Chief Technology Officer




Anders Koch

Group Financial Controller







See our list of current and previous employees when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 



                          Board of Directors                        



Stan Miller

Professional at The Capital Group Companies, Inc.




Thomas Colum Harding

Partner-Access Media at Access Industries, Inc. - New York





Ingvild Ragna Myhre

Director & Partner at Rådgiverne LOS AS




Jörg Mohaupt

Former Managing Director at Providence Equity Partners, Inc.





Jan Olof Scherman

Chief Executive Officer & Managing Director at TV4 AB




Jean Daniel Fouchard

Chief Executive Officer at AINMT Holdings AB





Hans-Holger Albrecht

Chief Executive Officer & Director at Deezer SA




Trygve Lauvdal

Investment Director at Rasmussengruppen AS





Phil Hewinson

Non-Executive Director at AINMT Holdings AB







See our list of current and previous board members when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Paths to AINMT Holdings AB



                        AINMT Holdings AB                    




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 AINMT Holdings AB






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with AINMT Holdings AB.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Recent Transactions



 Details Hidden



                                    AINMT Holdings AB purchases Nextel Telecomunicações Ltda. from NII Holdings, Inc.                                                                      




 Details Hidden



                                    Access Industries, Inc. - New York, AINMT Holdings AB purchase Nordisk Mobiltelefon Danmark A/S from EnergiMidt A/S                                                                      





 Transaction Advisors



Companies ▾




Escrow Agent



DNB Bank ASA

                                        Advised on
                                        AINMT Holdings AB purchases Nextel Telecomunicações Ltda. from NII Holdings, Inc.                                      




Legal Advisor



Weil, Gotshal & Manges LLP

                                        Advised on
                                        AINMT Holdings AB purchases Nextel Telecomunicações Ltda. from NII Holdings, Inc.                                      




People ▾




Legal Advisor



James Harvey

                                        Advised on
                                        AINMT Holdings AB purchases Nextel Telecomunicações Ltda. from NII Holdings, Inc.                                      




Legal Advisor



Marco Compagnoni

                                        Advised on
                                        AINMT Holdings AB purchases Nextel Telecomunicações Ltda. from NII Holdings, Inc.                                      





 Investors



 Details Hidden


Access Industries, Inc. - New York

                                    Access Industries industrial focus includes three sectors: natural resources and chemicals, media and telecommunications ,real estate and life sciences.                                






You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.















Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤




































Norway | Nokia Networks































Skip to main content











Menu





About Nokia
Careers
Contact Us

 

Worldwide 


Nokia Global Site
Worldwide Office Directory


Country sites
日本 (Japan)
Deutschland (Germany)
Latin America
España (Spain)
Netherlands
France
Portugal
Greece
Russia
भारत  (India)
Switzerland
Ireland
Türkiye (Turkey)
Italia (Italy)
 


Sign in | Extranets
 


Search form

Search form


SearchSearch




 











Norway








Fornebu
Martin Linges vei 25
			 Postboks 1
			 1330 Fornebu 
			Tel: +47 67-188-400


Oslo
Kabelgata 34, Oslo
			P.O. Box 4, Alnabru
			NO-0613 OSLO
			Switchboard: +47 2389 1010


 

 




 























































Unoterte aksjer (OTC) - Nyheter for AINMT AS


Nyheter for AINMT AS
Tilbake


Closing of Nextel Brazil transaction (AINMT)
Company news
2017-07-24 07:51:22


24 July 2017 - AINMT Holdings AB (AINMT) has successfully closed all conditions to complete the $50 million investment for a 30% stake in Brazilian mobile telecommunications company Nextel Brazil.Reference is made to AINMT's announcement dated 6 June 2017 when AINMT and NII Holdings, Inc. (NII) announced that they have entered into an agreement to jointly own and operate Nextel Brazil, a wholly owned subsidiary of NII. For further information, please contact:Investors: Johan Michelsen, Deputy CEO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media: Endre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 
 




Acquisition of B2C customer base (AINMT)
Company news
2017-07-11 08:43:32


11 July 2017 - AINMT's Norwegian network operator ice.net has entered into an agreement to acquire a B2C customer base from an undisclosed Norwegian mobile phone operator. Following the forthcoming migration process, ice.net will expect to have acquired a net amount of minimum 40,000 B2C customers. The customer base will be integrated into Ice Communication Norge AS.Ice.net will pay approximately NOK 75 million for the customer base, plus a potential bonus payment dependent on number of subscribers successfully migrated to Ice. The acquisition is fully financed by the recent equity injection into AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS (see announcement dated 4 July 2017 for further details). "Ice.net is the fastest growing mobile network operator in Scandinavia. The acquisition of this customer base will be a valuable addition to an already rapidly growing customer footprint in Norway," says JD Fouchard, CEO of AINMT. Closing of the agreement is expected on Wednesday 12 July 2017. The migration process is expected to take place between August and October 2017. The transaction is not subject to approval from Norwegian competition authorities.For further information, please contact:Investors: Johan Michelsen, Deputy CEO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media: Endre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, +47 41 61 06 05



 
 




AINMT AS - Private placement - New share capital registered
Company news
2017-06-23 08:13:03


23 June 2017 - Reference is made to previous announcements by AINMT AS (the "Company") in respect of the private placement (the "Private Placement") of a total of 2,225,416 new shares ("New Shares") in the Company for gross proceeds of approximately NOK 245 million.The share capital increase pertaining to the New Shares issued through the Private Placement was yesterday registered with the Norwegian Register of Business Enterprises (Nw. Foretaksregisteret). Following the registration, the registered share capital of the Company is NOK 49,334,039 comprising of 49,334,039 shares, each with a nominal value of NOK 1.For further information, please contact:Investors: Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media: Endre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 
 




AINMT AS - Minutes of extraordinary general meeting (AINMT)
Company news
2017-06-16 14:37:23


16 June 2017 - The extraordinary general meeting of AINMT AS was held 16 June 2017. All matters were approved by the shareholders. Reference is made to the notice of the extraordinary general meeting (EGM) dated 9 June 2017 and the announcement dated 15 June 2017 regarding the private placement in AINMT AS (AINMT). The private placement was approved by the EGM. AINMT has decided to issue 2,225,416 new shares at a price of NOK 110 per share. The proceeds will be used to subscribe for the same amount of new shares in AINMT Holdings AB. The total number of shares in AINMT AS will be 49 334 039 following the completion of the private placement. The gross proceeds to AINMT Holdings AB will be the equivalent of NOK 634,999,860 (approximately USD 75 million) following the issuance of 5,772,726 shares.  AINMT AS will hold 39.0% of the shares in AINMT Holdings AB following the completion of the equity issue in AINMT Holdings AB.Jörg Mohaupt (director of the board of AINMT AS and non- executive director of the board of AINMT Holdings AB) and existing shareholders Evermore Global Value Fund and Rasmussengruppen AS had guaranteed subscriptions of approximately NOK 161 million (USD 19 million) in the Private Placement, and have accepted to be scaled back for a total allocation of approximately NOK 99 million (USD 12 million).The minutes from the extraordinary general meeting are attached. For additional information regarding the private placement, please refer to AINMT's announcement of 15 June 2017, or contact:Investors: Johan Michelsen, Deputy CEO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media: Endre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 

AINMT AS - EGM minutes 2017.06.16.pdf




AINMT AS - AINMT completes private placement of NOK 635 million (approx. USD 75 million)  (AINMT)
Company news
2017-06-15 09:17:35


NOT FOR RELEASE, PUBLICATION OR DISTRIBUTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, IN AUSTRALIA, CANADA, JAPAN OR THE UNITED STATES.AINMT completes private placement of NOK 635 million (approx. USD 75 million) Oslo, 15 June 2017 - AINMT AS has successfully completed a private placement of new shares. The placement was oversubscribed. In addition to the equity contribution from Access Media directly into AINMT Holdings AB, the total gross proceeds to the AINMT Group amounts to approximately USD 75 million. The net proceeds will, among other, be used to fund the AINMT Group's investment in the Brazilian mobile telecommunications company Nextel Brazil. Reference is made to AINMT AS's ("AINMT") announcement dated 8 June 2017 regarding the contemplated private placement of between 1,463,225 - 5,775,886 new shares (the "Private Placement") at a fixed offer price of NOK 110 per offer share (the "Offer Price") raising gross proceeds of approximately NOK 161-635 million (approx. USD 19-75 million). The completion of the Private Placement is conditional upon all necessary corporate resolutions being made by AINMT and AINMT Holdings AB, including without limitation (a) approval by an extraordinary general meeting of AINMT to be held on 16 June 2017 of the Private Placement, and (b) the approval of the shares to be issued by AINMT Holdings AB to AINMT AS in an extraordinary general meeting of AINMT Holdings AB to be held on or about 16 June 2017. The Private Placement is expected to be registered with the Norwegian Registry of Business Enterprises on or about 22 June 2017, following which the new shares will be tradable at the OTC market in Oslo, Norway.Notification of allotment and payment instructions is expected to be sent to the applicants on 16 June 2017. A separate announcement containing details of exact number of shares to be issued, as well as allotment to existing major shareholders, will be distributed on 16 June 2017. DNB Markets, a part of DNB Bank ASA and Pareto Securities acted as joint bookrunners for the private placement.For further information, please contact:InvestorsJohan Michelsen, Deputy CEO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000MediaEndre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 
 




AINMT AS - Mandatory notification of trade (AINMT)
Company news
2017-06-14 17:15:03


14 June 2016 - Murat Erden, CFO of AINMT Holdings AB, has acquired a total of 57,139 shares in AINMT Holdings AB from Stan Miller, chairman of the board of AINMT Holdings AB, for a purchase price of NOK 110 per share. Subsequent to the share purchase, Murat Erden's 57,139 shares will be exchanged to AINMT AS shares at the same purchase price, and this transaction increases AINMT AS's shareholding in AINMT Holdings AB correspondingly. Following to these transactions, Murat Erden will own 57,139 shares in AINMT AS, while Stan Miller no longer owns any shares in AINMT Holdings AB. Following these transactions, AINMT AS will hold a 39% ownership share in AINMT Holdings AB.For further information, please contact:InvestorsJohan Michelsen, Deputy CEO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000MediaEndre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 
 




AINMT AS - EGM notice (AINMT)
Company news
2017-06-09 22:46:48


The Board of Directors hereby calls for an extraordinary general meeting of AINMT AS to be held on 16 June 2017 at 10:00 at Advokatfirmaet BA-HR's premises at Tjuvholmen in Oslo.Please find attached the full EGM notice.For further information, please contact:Johan Michelsen, Chairman of the board, +47 410 87 000



 

AINMT AS - EGM notice 2017.06.09.pdf




Endring av aksje: AINMT AS (AINMT)
Corporate actions
2017-06-08 14:41:22


Det er foretatt endringer i AINMT AS (ISIN:NO0010734742, ticker AINMT).  Aksjebeholdningen er øket fra 42 831 271 til 47 108 623.



 
 




AINMT AS - Contemplated private placement (AINMT)
Company news
2017-06-08 11:36:12


NOT FOR RELEASE, PUBLICATION OR DISTRIBUTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, IN AUSTRALIA, CANADA, JAPAN OR THE UNITED STATES.Oslo, 8 June 2017 - AINMT Holdings AB is contemplating a share issue of USD 50-75 million, of which USD 50m has been pre-committed by existing shareholders. In connection with this share issue, AINMT AS is contemplating a private placement (the "Private Placement") of approx. NOK 161-635 million (equivalent to approx. USD 19-75 million). The issue amount in AINMT AS is, among other, dependent on the final allocation of shares to pre-committed shareholders. The intention of the majority owner of AINMT Holdings AB, AI Media, is to subscribe for shares directly in AINMT Holdings AB and to maintain its pro-rata ownership (USD 31m at the lowest deal size). The proceeds from the Private Placement will be injected into AINMT Holdings AB, which has entered into an agreement to invest in the Brazilian mobile telecommunications company Nextel Brazil. For further information about the Nextel Brazil agreement, please refer to announcement from AINMT Holdings AB dated 6 June 2017.The Private PlacementThe Private Placement comprises of 1,463,225 shares and maximum 5,775,886 new shares at a fixed offer price of NOK 110 per offer share, raising gross proceeds of between approx. NOK 161 and 635 million (approx. USD 19 to 75 million ). The minimum order amount is set to the NOK amount equivalent to EUR 100,000. The gross proceeds of the Private Placement will be injected into AINMT Holdings AB in a contemplated capital increase in AINMT Holdings AB. AINMT Holdings AB will use the gross proceeds to fund step 1 of the Nextel Brazil transaction, where AINMT will invest USD 50 million for a 30% stake in Nextel Holdings S.à r.l. The Private Placement enables the Company to maintain its pro-rata shareholding in AINMT Holdings AB. Funding of step 1 gives AINMT an option, but no obligation, to invest an additional USD 150 million in Nextel Brazil, which would result in a 60% controlling stake in the company. Jörg Mohaupt (director of the board of AINMT AS, non- executive director of the board of AINMT Holdings AB, and responsible for the media, online and telecom business at Access Industries) has guaranteed subscription of USD 5 million in the Private Placement. Rasmussengruppen and Evermore, both existing shareholders, have guaranteed subscriptions of respectively USD 6 million and USD 8 million in AINMT AS. AI Media Holdings LLC ("Al Media"), a subsidiary holding company of Access Industries, has guaranteed subscription of USD 31 million in the private placement in AINMT Holdings AB. The application period commences at 11:30 hours (CET) on 8 June 2017, and ends at 16:30 hours (CET) on 14 June 2017. AINMT AS, at its sole discretion, reserves the right to shorten or extend the application period at any time.The conditional allocation of shares will be determined on or about 15 June 2017. The final allocation will be resolved by the board of directors of AINMT AS. The completion of the Private Placement is conditional upon (i) all necessary corporate resolutions being validly made, by the Company and AINMT Holdings AB, including without limitation (a) approval by an extraordinary general meeting of the Company to be held on or about 16 June 2017 (b)  the approval of the shares to be issued by AINMT Holdings AB to AINMT AS in an extraordinary general meeting of AINMT Holdings AB on or about 16 June 2017; (ii) payment being received for the allocated Offer Shares and (iii) registration of the share capital increase in the Company pursuant to the Private Placement in the Norwegian Register of Business Enterprises. The Private Placement will be cancelled if the conditions are not fulfilled, and may be cancelled by the Company in its sole discretion for any other reason.DNB Markets, a part of DNB Bank ASA and Pareto Securities AS have been appointed as joint bookrunners for the Private Placement.About AINMTAINMT AS' sole purpose is to invest in shares in AINMT Holdings AB. The remaining shares in AINMT Holdings AB are owned by Access Industries through one or more of its holding companies, and by board members, members of management and certain other persons.AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV, which has significant ownership shares of STI in Indonesia and Broadband Everywhere in the Philippines AINMT is an international telecommunications company. Its focus is wireless data communication services, the fastest growing business segment within the telecom sector. AINMT's Norwegian operation, ice.net, is Norway's third largest mobile network operator and fastest growing provider of voice and wireless data services operating on 4G-only networks for smartphones and mobile broadband. Today, the company is well established in Scandinavia (Norway, Sweden and Denmark) and has recently launched 4G networks in Indonesia and the Philippines. AINMT is actively pursuing international expansion opportunities, aiming to satisfy the pent-up demand for internet access and data consumption in developing countries.AINMT's plan to apply for a listing on Oslo Børs/Oslo Axess, or other regulated market, in 2017, remains firm.AINMT's ultimate majority owner is Access Industries, a privately held industrial group with long-term holdings worldwide. Its industrial focus spans four sectors: natural resources and chemicals; media and telecommunications; technology and e-commerce; and real estate.1) based on exchange rate of 8.4713 as published on Norges Bank's websiteFor further information, please contact:Investors:Johan Michelsen, Deputy CEO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media:Endre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: wndre.johansen@corpcom.no.



 
 




AINMT AS - AGM minutes (AINMT)
Company news
2017-06-07 21:22:57


On June 7, 2017 at 14:00 hours CET the ordinary general meeting was held by AINMT AS. All matters were approved by shareholders. Please find the minutes of the meeting attached.For further information, please contact:Johan Michelsen, chairman of the board, +47 410 87 000



 

AINMT AS - AGM minutes 2017.06.07.pdf




AINMT AS: AINMT and NII Holdings announce partnership to invest in Nextel Brazil's growth strategy (AINMT)
Company news
2017-06-06 07:15:02


Stockholm, 6 June 2017 - AINMT Holdings AB ("AINMT") and NII Holdings, Inc. ("NII") (NASDAQ: NIHD) announced today that they have entered into an agreement to jointly own and operate Brazilian mobile telecommunications company Nextel Brazil, a wholly owned subsidiary of NII. Initially and subject to certain conditions, AINMT will invest $50 million for a 30% stake in Nextel Holdings S.à r.l. (the "Company"). AINMT will have the option to invest an additional $150 million in the Company. If such option is exercised, AINMT's total $200 million new equity investment would result in a 60% controlling stake in the Company. NII will contribute capital in accordance with the Investment Sequencing described below and retain a 40% stake in the Company if AINMT exercises its option.NII and AINMT will host a joint investor conference call to discuss the partnership and new equity investment at 11:00am EST on June 6th, 2017.Please see attached announcement for further details about the agreement and the investor conference call.



 

AINMT and NII Holdings announce partnership to invest in Nextel Brazils growth strategy - 06062017.pdf




AINMT AS: Annual General Meeting (AINMT)
Company news
2017-05-31 16:55:54


The Board of Directors hereby calls for the ordinary general meeting of AINMT AS to be held on 7 June 2017 at 14:00 at Advokatfirmaet BA HR's premises at Tjuvholmen in Oslo. The notice have been sent to all registered shareholders on 31 May 2017 in regular mail. For further information, please contact:Johan Michelsen, Chairman of the board, +47 410 87 000



 

AINMT AS - AGM notice 2017.05.31a.pdf




AINMT AS - Quarterly Update Q1 2017, financial update (AINMT)
Company news
2017-05-31 15:58:25


In The Philippines AINMT launched 4G broadband services on the 450 MHz band during the quarter and the feedback has been very positive. In Indonesia the local operator has made significant progress related to the preparation of a 4G broadband launch on the second half of 2017.As communicated on 8 March 2017, a new share issue was made with 4,277,352 shares. The subscription was paid in kind with shares in AINMT Holdings AB. As a result, AINMT AS now owns 39% of the shares in AINMT Holding AB.AINMT Holdings AB, excluding Scandinavia, held USD 39 million in cash as per 31 March 2017. Total operating expenditures in AINMT Holdings AB, excluding Scandinavia, during Q1 2017 amounted to approx. USD 1 million.For further details on the Q1 numbers, please follow this link to the quarterly reporting of AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS: https://www.ainmt.com/investor-relations/financial-reporting/



 
 




AINMT - AINMT appoints Chief Financial Officer (AINMT)
Company news
2017-05-22 08:10:25


Oslo/Stockholm, 22 May 2017 - AINMT Holdings AB (AINMT) has appointed Murat Erden as the AINMT group's new CFO. Current CFO, Johan Michelsen, assumes the position as deputy CEO.Mr Murat Erden is a highly experienced CFO with an extensive background from the international telecommunication and financial services industries. He was previously the Group CFO of NYSE-listed Turkcell - a major telecom player operating across nine European countries. As Group CFO, Mr Erden orchestrated numerous billion-dollar funding facilities for the group and oversaw its controlling activities including reporting, planning, budgeting and M&A valuations.In addition to his role as Group CFO, Mr Erden held number of senior positions during his 15 years in Turkcell, both as non-executive board member at international joint ventures and Group companies, and as Group Director of Treasury, Risk Management and Procurement. He also founded and sponsored the Consumer Finance Company for Turkcell. Since 2016, he has managed his consultancy firm in London, UK. Mr Erden is a London Business School Alumni and holds an MBA from San Diego State University, USA.Mr Erden will assume his role with AINMT immediately. The current CFO, Mr Johan Michelsen, will at the same time start in the newly created position as deputy CEO."Our international footprint has grown rapidly in the past couple of years, so we saw the need to strengthen our team. We are very pleased to be able to attract such a highly accomplished CFO as Murat to the group," says JD Fouchard, CEO of AINMT.For further information, please contact:InvestorsJohan Michelsen, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000MediaEndre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 
 




AINMT - AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS signs and allocates NOK 1,400m senior term facilities (AINMT)
Company news
2017-04-07 15:37:44


Oslo, 7 April 2017 - Further to the announcements regarding the underwritten secured bank facilities and the successful placement of the 5 year NOK 800 million senior unsecured bond issue on 8 and 9 March 2017 respectively, AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS ("AINMT" or the "Company") is pleased to announce the successful signing and completion of both the NOK 1,400 million secured bank facilities and the 5 year NOK 800 million senior unsecured bond issue, to be applied, i.a., for the refinancing of AINMT.AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS is part of AINMT Group, focusing on 4G networks and mobile data on smartphones and routers. The Company operates in Norway through the brand ice.net and through Net1 in Sweden and Denmark. The AINMT Group's operations in Indonesia and The Philippines are held in AINMT International and not included in the Scandinavian entity.The Company is wholly owned by AINMT Holdings AB. AINMT Holdings AB is again owned by AINMT AS (39%) which is N-OTC listed.The debt facility consists of a NOK 200 million 4-year term loan A, NOK 600 million 5-year term loan B and a NOK 600 million 5-year term loan C (growth) facility, paying N+425bps, N+475bps and N+450bps, respectively with a ratchet that leads to lower interest margin once certain milestones have been passed. The debt package also includes a 5-year NOK 800m unsecured bond paying N+525bps, which closes simultaneously with the debt facility. The proceeds of the refinancing shall be used to (i) part-finance the full redemption of the existing SEK 1,500m bond and (ii) for general corporate purposes.DNB acted as Sole Underwriter, Bookrunner and MLA for the senior term facilities. DNB and Pareto Securities were Joint Lead Managers on the bond transaction.Both transactions were oversubscribed. The syndicated loan was placed with institutional investors.DNB also acts as Security and Facility Agent for the Company. For questions to the Company or AINMT Group, please contact Johan Michelsen at AINMT at +47 4108 7000 or at johan.michelsen@ainmt.comFor questions related to the debt facilities, please contact Christian Dyvik, Director at DNB Markets at christian.dyvik@dnb.no



 
 




AINMT - AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS - successful placement of NOK senior unsecured bond issue (AINMT)
Company news
2017-03-09 16:59:17


Oslo, 9 March, 2017Further to the announcement of the underwritten secured bank facilities and a contemplated bond issue on 8 March 2017, AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS ("AINMT" or the "Company") is pleased to announce a successful placement of a new 5 year NOK 800 million senior unsecured bond issue. The placement was significantly oversubscribed.The Company has also decided to issue a notice of early redemption for the outstanding SEK 1.5 billion senior secured bonds maturing in March 2019 with ISIN NO 0010705601 (the "SEK Bonds"). The new bond is a part of a refinancing into a corporate financing structure comprising of secured bank facilities underwritten by DNB Bank ASA and the new unsecured bond issue, which yields significant increased flexibility for the Company going forward and reduces interest costs from 9.75% in the SEK Bonds to a blended debt financing cost of NIBOR +4.80% across the committed underwritten secured bank facilities and the new bond issue at the point of the refinancing, with a potential for further reduction in financing cost on the secured bank facilities subject to certain conditions. DNB Markets and Pareto Securities acted as arrangers of the bond issue. For further information, please contact:InvestorsJohan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000MediaEndre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no.DNB Markets, +47 24 16 90 30Pareto Securities, +47 22 87 87 70



 
 




AINMT AS - Mandatory notification of trade (AINMT)
Company news
2017-03-08 08:16:37


Oslo, 8 March 2016 - Reference is made to the announcements from AINMT AS dated 21 November 2016 ("AINMT AS: Contemplated private placement") and 30 November ("AINMT completes private placement").The announcement dated 21 November 2016 stated: "Subsequent to the completion of the private placement, certain board member(s) and top-management member(s) at AINMT Holdings AB have the intention to purchase shares in AINMT Holdings AB from Access Industries for a minimum of NOK 250 million in total. If the purchase is completed, these shares will be exchanged to AINMT AS shares at the same purchase price, and this transaction increases AINMT AS's shareholding in AINMT Holdings AB correspondingly."On 8 March 2017, JD Fouchard, CEO of the AINMT group, purchased a total of 558,542 shares in AINMT Holdings AB from Access Industries at yesterday's closing share price, NOK108. Subsequent to the transaction, JD Fouchard will own 1,478,573 shares in AINMT AS. Jörg Mohaupt, a director on the board of AINMT Holdings AB and responsible for the media, online and telecom business at Access Industries, also purchased a total 3,718,810 shares in AINMT Holdings AB from Access Industries at yesterday's closing share price, NOK108. Subsequent to the transaction, Jörg Mohaupt's aggregate holding, including shares held through his holding company SA Ferreira LLC, will be 9,711,603 shares in AINMT AS.Following these transactions, AINMT AS holds a 39% ownership share in AINMT Holdings AB. Access Industries holds the remaining ownership share. For further information, please contact:InvestorsJohan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000MediaEndre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 
 




AINMT AS - AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS - underwritten bank facilities and contemplated NOK bond issue
Company news
2017-03-08 07:34:46


Oslo, 8 March, 2017AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS ("AIMNT" or the "Company") announces underwritten bank facilities with DNB Bank ASA (subject to certain conditions precedent) comprising senior secured facilities of NOK 800 million. Furthermore, the Company has an additional underwritten facility of NOK 600 million which may be drawn for organic and inorganic growth purposes, subject to certain conditions going forward. With tenors of 4-5 years, the facilities provide a robust and flexible financing platform for AINMT going forward. As a part of the refinancing, the Company contemplates to issue NOK 800 million of floating rate senior unsecured bonds with a 5 year tenor in the Nordic bond market, subject to inter alia market conditions. Prior to closing of bank facilities and bond issue, AINMT Holdings AB commits to inject NOK 830 million in equity or sub-ordinated loans into AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS ("Scandinavia"). This figure includes an amount of NOK 400 million already contributed as a subordinated loan into Scandinavia following the NOK 800 million AINMT AS share issue in Q416. In addition to the injections of capital into the Scandinavian operation, AINMT Holdings AB has invested additional capital into its International operation in order to increase ownership in Indonesia and secure funding for swapping the network to LTE. Following these injections, AINMT Holdings AB will retain a cash position of approximately USD 40 million at the AINMT Holdings AB level earmarked for further International growth.AINMT has mandated DNB Markets and Pareto Securities to arrange the contemplated bond issue, including fixed income investor meetings commencing on 8 March.In conjunction with the contemplated bond issue, the Company may offer a conditional buy-back of its SEK denominated bonds maturing in March 2019 (ISIN NO 0010705601, the "SEK Bonds"). Subject to completion of the above financings, AINMT will issue a call notice for the SEK Bonds (the current prevailing call price is 103.90% of par value).For further information, please contact:Investors: Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media: Endre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no.]DNB Markets, +47 24 16 90 30Pareto Securites, +47 22 87 87 70



 
 




AINMT AS - Quarterly Update Q4 2016, financial update (AINMT)
Company news
2017-02-28 16:33:26


In November, AINMT's subsidiary in the Philippines secured the exclusive right to use 10MHz in the nationwide 450 MHz band. Additionally, Indonesian authorities formally approved the adoption of tech neutrality in the country's 450 MHz frequency band, where AINMT's subsidiary holds 2x7.5 MHz.AINMT AS successfully completed a private placement in the fourth quarter, through issuance of new shares for a total consideration of appr. NOK 800 million. The main reason is further growth ambitions in Norway - both in terms of customer acquisition and network infrastructure build-out. Subsequent to the private placement, AINMT Holdings AB granted a subordinated shareholder loan to AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS. The loan has a cap of NOK 400 million with an initial disbursement of NOK 200 million.AINMT Holdings AB, excluding Scandinavia, held USD 179 million in cash as per 31 December 2016. Total expenses 2016 in AINMT Holdings AB, excluding Scandinavia, amounted to SEK 41 million of which the fourth quarter held 10m related to group cost sharing and 9,7m non-recurring third party expenses related to transactions and to work related to potential international expansions.For further details on the Q4 numbers, please follow this link to the quarterly reporting of AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS:https://www.ainmt.com/investor-relations/financial-reporting/



 
 




Endring av aksje: AINMT AS (AINMT)
Corporate actions
2016-12-06 14:01:53


Det er foretatt endringer i AINMT AS (ISIN:NO0010734742, ticker AINMT).  Aksjebeholdningen er øket fra 31 402 271 til 42 831 271. Emisjonsverdien er øket fra 2 041 147 615 til 2 998 188 970.



 
 




AINMT AS - Private placement - New share capital registered (AINMT)
Company news
2016-12-05 21:17:16


Reference is made to previous announcements by AINMT AS (the "Company") in respect of the private placement (the "Private Placement") of a total of 11,429,000 new shares ("New Shares") in the Company for gross proceeds of approximately NOK 800 million.The share capital increase pertaining to the New Shares issued through the Private Placement was today registered with the Norwegian Register of Business Enterprises (Nw. Foretaksregisteret). Following the registration, the registered share capital of the Company is NOK 42,831,271 comprising of 42,831,271 shares, each with a nominal value of NOK 1. Pareto Securities has acted as sole lead manager for the Private Placement.For further information, please contact:Investors: Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media: Endre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no.



 
 




AINMT AS - Minutes of extraordinary general meeting (AINMT)
Company news
2016-12-01 13:13:05


An extraordinary general meeting of AINMT AS ("AINMT") has today approved the issuance of up to 11 429 000 new shares at a price of NOK 70 per share in the previously announced private placement. The minutes from the extraordinary general meeting are attached.For additional information regarding the private placement, please refer to AINMT's announcement of 30 November 2016, or contact:Investors: Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media: Endre Aaaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 

AINMT AS - EGM minutes 2016.12.01.pdf




AINMT AS - AINMT AS completes private placement (AINMT)
Company news
2016-11-30 07:26:02


Oslo, 30 November 2016 - AINMT AS has successfully completed a private placement through issuance of new shares for a total consideration of NOK 800 million. The decision to conduct a private placement is primarily driven by further growth ambitions in Norway - both in terms of customer acquisition and network infrastructure build-out. The completion of the private placement is subject to EGM approvals.NOT FOR DISTRIBUTION OR RELEASE, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, IN OR INTO THE UNITED STATES, CANADA, AUSTRALIA, HONG KONG OR JAPAN OR ANY OTHER JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE DISTRIBUTION OR RELEASE WOULD BE UNLAWFUL.Reference is made to AINMT AS's ("AINMT") announcement dated 21 November 2016 regarding the contemplated private placement of between 7,143,000 - 11,429,000 new shares (the "Private Placement") at a fixed offer price of NOK 70 per offer share (the "Offer Price") raising gross proceeds of between NOK 500,010,000 and NOK 800,030,000 (approx. USD 58-93 million).AINMT has successfully placed 11,429,000 shares towards Norwegian and international institutional and professional investors at the Offer Price, raising gross proceeds of NOK 800,030,000 (USD 93.2 million). Access Industries and Rasmussengruppen AS had pre-subscribed for NOK 250 million each in the Private Placement. The gross proceeds of approximately NOK 800 million will be used to subscribe for 11,429,000 new shares in AINMT Holdings AB at the Offer Price. AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV. AINMT Holdings AB will use the proceeds to fund further growth ambitions in Norway - both in terms of customer acquisition and network infrastructure build-out.The completion of the Private Placement is conditional upon all necessary corporate resolutions being made by AINMT and AINMT Holdings AB, including without limitation (a) approval by an extraordinary general meeting of AINMT to be held on 1 December 2016 of the Private Placement, and (b) approval by the general meeting of AINMT Holdings AB to be held on or about 1 December 2016 of the issuance of 11,429,000 shares in AINMT Holdings AB to AINMT. The Private Placement is expected to be registered with the Norwegian Registry of Business Enterprises on or about 6 December 2016, following which the new shares will be tradable at the OTC market in Oslo, Norway. Following completion of the Private Placement, AINMT will have issued 42,831,271 shares in total, and AINMT Holdings AB will have issued 120,791,335 shares in total, of which AINMT will own approximately 35.5%. Notification of allotment and payment instructions will be sent to the applicants on 30 November 2016. Pareto Securities acts as sole lead manager for the private placement.For further information, please contact:Investors: Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media: Endre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 
 




AINMT AS - Notice of extraordinary general meeting (AINMT)
Company news
2016-11-24 10:05:21


The Board of Directors hereby calls for an extraordinary general meeting of AINMT AS to be held on Thursday 1 December 2016 at 10:00 (CET) at Advokatfirmaet BA-HR DA, Tjuvholmen allé 16, 0252 Oslo, Norway, for approval of the contemplated private placement of shares as announced on 21 November 2016.Please find attached the full EGM notice. The notice has also been distributed to all registered shareholders on 23 November 2016.For further information, please contact: Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000



 

AINMT AS - Notice of EGM.pdf




AINMT AS - AINMT AS: Contemplated private placement (AINMT)
Company news
2016-11-21 07:50:10


NOT FOR RELEASE, PUBLICATION OR DISTRIBUTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, IN AUSTRALIA, CANADA, JAPAN OR THE UNITED STATES.AINMT AS: Contemplated private placementOslo, 21 November 2016 - AINMT AS (AINMT) is contemplating a private placement of new shares with the objective of raising gross proceeds of approximately NOK 500 - 800 million. Access Industries and Rasmussengruppen AS have pre-subscribed for NOK 250 million each in the private placement.The decision to conduct a private placement is primarily driven by further growth ambitions in Norway - both in terms of customer acquisition and network infrastructure build-out.The plan to apply for a listing on Oslo Børs/Oslo Axess, or other regulated market, in 2017, remains firm. Business updateAs reported in June this year, AINMT's fully owned Norwegian operation, ice.net, benefitted from much higher subscriber sales than expected in April and May. Hence, a private placement was completed in June. Subsequently, the sales rate for mobile phone subscriptions has continued to be high throughout both the second and third quarter. Additionally, ice.net completed the migration of the company's smartphone customers from Telia's network across to ice.net's own 4G-only network and IT platform in the third quarter. As a result, ice.net plans to start generating smartphone on-net traffic from Q1 2017. In the Philippines, AINMT's subsidiary Broadband Everywhere ("BE") has secured additional nationwide spectrum in the 450 MHz band. BE has secured the exclusive right to use 10MHz in the 450 MHz frequency band. Earlier this year AINMT increased its shareholding in BE. Securing the full 2x5MHz (compliant with 3GPP standard) will lead to improved utilisation of the network and better economics. Indonesian authorities have formally approved the adoption of tech neutrality in the country's 450 MHz frequency band, where AINMT's partner PT Sampoerna Telekomunikasi Indonesia (STI) holds 2x7.5 MHz.  The decision follows the advice of the Indonesian telecommunication regulatory body, BRTI (Badan Regulasi Telekomunikasi Indonesia), which earlier this year recommended tech neutrality for the 450 MHz frequency to improve internet penetration in Indonesia. The decision to adopt tech neutrality will enable STI to provide a highly improved 4G-only LTE offering to Indonesia's inhabitants and businesses, which in turn will significantly strengthen the commercial potential of the wireless data network. The private placementThe private placement comprises 7,143,000 - 11,429,000 new shares at a fixed offer price of NOK 70 per offer share, raising gross proceeds of between NOK 500,010,000 and NOK 800,030,000 (approx. USD 58-93 million). The minimum order amount is set to the NOK amount equivalent to EUR 100,000. This private placement will correspond to approximately 18.5-26.7% of the share capital of AINMT AS following the completion of the private placement.Access Industries and Rasmussengruppen AS, have pre-subscribed for offer shares for NOK 250 million each in the private placement. The gross proceeds of the private placement will be invested in shares in AINMT Holdings AB. The application period commences at 09:00 hours (CET) on 21 November 2016, and ends at 16:30 hours (CET) on 29 November 2016. AINMT AS, at its sole discretion, reserves the right to shorten or extend the application period at any time. The conditional allocation of shares will be determined on or about 30 November 2016. The final allocation will be resolved by the board of directors of AINMT AS. Following completion of the private placement, AINMT AS will hold between 33.1 - 35.5% of AINMT Holdings AB.The completion of the private placement is conditional upon (i) all necessary corporate resolutions being validly made, by AINMT AS and AINMT Holdings AB, including without limitation (a) approval by an extraordinary general meeting of AINMT AS to be held on or about 1 December 2016 of an authorisation to the board of directors to issue the offer shares, (b) approval of the share capital increase and allocation and issue of new shares required for completion of the private placement by the Board of Directors of the Company pursuant to the granted authorisation, (c) approval by the Board of Directors of AINMT Holdings AB of the shares to be issued to AINMT AS, and (d) the approval of the shares to be issued by AINMT Holdings AB to AINMT AS in an extraordinary general meeting of AINMT Holdings AB on or about 1 December  2016; (ii) payment being received for the allocated offer shares  and (iii) registration of the share capital increase in AINMT AS pursuant to the private placement in the Norwegian Register of Business Enterprises. The private placement will be cancelled if the conditions are not fulfilled, and may be cancelled by AINMT AS in its sole discretion for any other reason.Pareto Securities has been appointed as sole lead manager for the private placement.Subsequent to the completion of the private placement, certain board member(s) and top-management member(s) at AINMT Holdings AB have the intention to purchase shares in AINMT Holdings AB from Access Industries for a minimum of NOK 250 million in total. If the purchase is completed, these shares will be exchanged to AINMT AS shares at the same purchase price, and this transaction increases AINMT AS's shareholding in AINMT Holdings AB correspondingly. About AINMTAINMT AS's sole purpose is to invest in shares in AINMT Holdings AB. The remaining shares in AINMT Holdings AB are owned by Access Industries through one or more of its holding companies, and by board members, members of management and certain other persons. AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV, which has significant ownership shares of STI in Indonesia and Broadband Everywhere in the Philippines.AINMT is an international telecommunications company. Its focus is wireless data communication services, the fastest growing business segment within the telecom sector. Its unique business model, with focus on low frequency bands, allows the company to offer wireless broadband to large geographical areas while maintaining an effective network infrastructure. Low frequencies have long reach and require fewer base stations to cover large areas. This is a perfect match for rural districts, areas with varied topography and markets with underdeveloped telecommunication infrastructure. Altogether, this allows for high quality wireless data communication at a very low cost per bit. In Norway, where the company owns higher frequency bands, we also offer a full range of mobile services without having legacy networks to maintain and support. Today, AINMT has license coverage to reach 380 million people worldwide. The company is well established in Scandinavia and has partnerships and 450 MHz frequencies in Indonesia and the Philippines. It is actively pursuing international expansion opportunities, aiming to satisfy the pent-up demand for internet access and data consumption in developing countries.AINMT's ultimate majority owner is Access Industries, a privately held industrial group with long-term holdings worldwide. Its industrial focus spans four sectors: natural resources and chemicals; media and telecommunications; technology and e-commerce; and real estate.For further information, please contact:Investors: Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media: Endre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no.



 

AINMT AS - Private Placement - 21112016 - FINAL.pdf




AINMT AS - Quarterly Update Q3 2016, financial update (AINMT)
Company news
2016-11-21 07:44:32


In August, AINMT Holdings AB granted NOK 450 million shareholder loan to AINMT Scandinavia Holdings to provide the Norwegian operation with added financial flexibility.AINMT Holdings AB, excluding Scandinavia, held USD 81 million in cash at the end of Q3 2016. Expenses year-to-date in AINMT Holdings AB, excluding Scandinavia, amounted to SEK 12.2 million (as per 30 September 2016).For further details on the Q3 numbers, please follow this link to the quarterly reporting of AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS:https://www.ainmt.com/investor-relations/financial-reporting/



 
 




AINMT AS - Indonesian authorities grant tech neutrality for the 450 MHz band (AINMT)
Company news
2016-11-18 09:22:56


18 November 2016 - Indonesian authorities have formally approved the adoption of tech neutrality in the country's 450 MHz frequency band, where PT Sampoerna Telekomunikasi Indonesia (STI) holds 2x7.5 MHz.  The decision follows the advice of the Indonesian telecommunication regulatory body, BRTI (Badan Regulasi Telekomunikasi Indonesia), which earlier this year recommended tech neutrality for the 450 MHz frequency to improve internet penetration in Indonesia.Up until now, only 2G and 3G equipment and devices could be deployed on the 450 MHz frequency band. The decision to remove this restriction will enable STI to provide a highly improved 4G-only LTE offering to Indonesia's inhabitants and businesses, which in turn will significantly strengthen the commercial potential of the wireless data network. STI will now aim to build the #1 4G network coverage in Indonesia, which is the world's fourth most populous country with a population of almost 260 million spread across more than fourteen thousand islands."The 450 MHz frequency is particularly well suited for nations such as Indonesia where the population is spread across large geographical distances. There is a pent up demand for internet access and we aim to address this demand and capitalize on the significant business opportunities it represents," says JD Fouchard, CEO of AINMT.For further information, please contact: Investors: Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media: Endre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 
 




AINMT AS - AINMT secures additional 450 MHz spectrum in the Philippines (AINMT)
Company news
2016-11-14 07:04:15


14 November 2016 - AINMT's subsidiary in the Philippines, Broadband Everywhere ("BE"), has secured additional nationwide spectrum in the 450 MHz band.BE has been informed by the National Telecommunications Commission that it has secured the exclusive right to use 10MHz in the 450 MHz frequency band. Earlier this year AINMT increased its shareholding in BE. Securing the full 2x5MHz (compliant with 3GPP standard) will lead to improved utilisation of the network and better economics."BE is now in a great position to build a profitable 4G network that provides wireless internet access for business and residential customers as well as the M2M/IoT market. BE's aim is to become the leading 4G coverage network in the Philippines," says JD Fouchard, CEO of AINMT.The Philippines has a population of approximately 100 million people and consists of 7,107 islands with a total land area of 300,000 square kilometres.For further information, please contact: Investors: Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media: Endre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 
 




AINMT AS - Quarterly Update Q2 2016, financial update (AINMT)
Company news
2016-08-31 15:17:45


For further details on the Q2 numbers, please follow this link to the quarterly reporting of AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS:https://www.ainmt.com/investor-relations/financial-reporting/



 
 




AINMT AS - Quarterly Update Q2 2016, financial update (AINMT)
Company news
2016-08-31 14:58:58


AINMT completed a NOK 429 million private placement in June and subsequently subscribed shares in AINMT Holdings AB, which in turn has granted a subordinated shareholder loan to AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS. The loan has a cap of NOK 450 million with an initial disbursement of NOK 200 million. The funds will facilitate additional growth in Norway.AINMT Holdings AB completed its contractual commitments in the Philippines and invested USD 13 million into Broadband Everywhere in the quarter, increasing its ownership share further. AINMT Holdings AB, excluding Scandinavia, held USD 157 million in cash at the end of Q2 2016. Total recurring costs year-to-date in AINMT Holdings AB, excluding Scandinavia, amounted to SEK 8.8 million (as per 30 June 2016).



 
 




Endring av aksje: AINMT AS (AINMT)
Corporate actions
2016-08-11 10:33:50


Det er foretatt endringer i AINMT AS (ISIN:NO0010734742, ticker AINMT).  Aksjebeholdningen er øket fra 24 800 715 til 31 402 271. Emisjonsverdien er øket fra 1 021 798 768 til 2 041 147 615.



 
 




AINMT AS - AGM minutes (AINMT)
Company news
2016-07-25 11:05:31


On July 22, 2016 at 13:00 hours CET the ordinary general meeting was held by AINMT AS. All matters were approved by shareholders. Please find the minutes of the meeting attached.For further information, please contact:Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000



 

AINMT AS - AGM minutes 2016.07.22.pdf




AINMT AS - Call for Ordinary General Meeting (AINMT)
Company news
2016-07-15 13:39:37


The Board of Directors hereby calls for the ordinary general meeting of AINMT AS to be held on 22 July 2016 at 13:00 CET at the company's premises in Oslo.The notice have been sent to all registered shareholders 15th of July 2016 in regular mail.For further information, please contact:Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000



 

AINMT AS - AGM notice 2016.07.22.pdf




AINMT AS: mandatory notification of trade (AINMT)
Company news
2016-07-01 07:17:31


Oslo, 1 July 2016 - Employees in the AINMT group have purchased a total of 48 170 shares in AINMT AS at NOK 65 per share for a combined value of NOK 3 131 050,-. In addition, an ice.net executive has sold 10 000 shares, which have been purchased by other executives and employees.As a consequence of interest from employees within the AINMT group to acquire AINMT AS shares at the same price as the share issue completed last week, AINMT has organised a process that gives employees an opportunity to buy shares below the minimum subscription amount of EUR 100 000. The 48 170 shares have been acquired through a combination of subscription in the share issue completed last week (17 692 shares), purchase from a private investor (20 478 shares), and from an ice.net executive (10 000 shares). On 30 June 2016, Martin Westersø, finance director of ice.net, sold 10,000 shares in AINMT AS at a price of NOK 65 per share. Following this transaction, Martin Westersø continues to own 13 194 shares in AINMT AS. Commenda AS, a company owned by CFO of AINMT Holdings AB and chairman of the board of AINMT AS, Johan Michelsen, has acquired 3 846 shares. Eivind Helgaker, managing director of ice.net, has also acquired 3 846 shares, while employees in ice.net have acquired the remaining 2 308 shares. All shares have been purchased at a price of NOK 65 per share.Subsequent to these transactions, Johan Michelsen owns 1,208,377 shares in AINMT AS, while Eivind Helgaker owns 9,846 shares in AINMT AS and 138,130 shares in AINMT Holdings AB. For further information, please contact:Investors: Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000Media: Endre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 
 




AINMT AS - Share capital increase registered (AINMT)
Company news
2016-06-24 14:40:15


Oslo, 24 June 2016 - Reference is made to the press release from AINMT AS ("AINMT" or the "Company") dated 20 June 2016 regarding the completed private placement of 6,601,556 shares  towards Norwegian and international institutional and professional investors at a price of NOK 65 per share (the "Offer Price").The share capital increases pertaining to the private placement have now been registered with the Norwegian Register of Business Enterprises. The share capital of AINMT is NOK 31,402,271 divided over 31,402,271 shares.



 
 




AINMT AS - Extraordinary general meeting approves private placement (AINMT)
Company news
2016-06-22 11:28:49


NOT FOR DISTRIBUTION OR RELEASE, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, IN OR INTO THE UNITED STATES, CANADA, AUSTRALIA, HONG KONG OR JAPAN OR ANY OTHER JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE DISTRIBUTION OR RELEASE WOULD BE UNLAWFUL.Oslo, 22 June 2016 - The extraordinary general meeting of AINMT AS (AINMT) has today approved the issuance of 6,601,556 new shares at price of NOK 65 per share, raising gross proceeds of NOK 429 million. The minutes from the extraordinary general meeting are attached.DNB Markets and Pareto Securities acted as joint managers in connection with the private placement. For additional information regarding the private placement, please refer to AINMT's announcement of 20 June 2016, or contact: InvestorsJohan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000MediaEndre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 

AINMT AS - EGM minutes 2016.06.22.pdf




AINMT AS - AINMT AS completes private placement (AINMT)
Company news
2016-06-20 06:46:20


NOT FOR DISTRIBUTION OR RELEASE, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, IN OR INTO THE UNITED STATES, CANADA, AUSTRALIA, HONG KONG OR JAPAN OR ANY OTHER JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE DISTRIBUTION OR RELEASE WOULD BE UNLAWFUL.Oslo, 20 June 2016 - AINMT AS has successfully completed a private placement through issuance of new shares for a total consideration of NOK 429 million. The proceeds will be used to further capitalise on the strong sales momentum in AINMT's Norwegian operation. The completion of the private placement is subject to EGM approvals.Reference is made to AINMT AS' (AINMT) announcement dated 6 June 2016 regarding the contemplated private placement of between 5,850,000 - 8,800,000 new shares (the "Private Placement"). AINMT has successfully placed 6,601,556 shares towards Norwegian and international institutional and professional investors at a price of NOK 65 per share (the "Offer Price").The gross proceeds of approximately NOK 429 million (USD 51 million) will be used to subscribe for 6,601,556 new shares in AINMT Holdings AB at the Offer Price. AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV. AINMT Holdings AB will use the proceeds to fund higher customer acquisition in Norway than previously anticipated and to fund higher investments in sites and IT-systems in Norway in order to have more on-net traffic and enable disruptive offerings.The completion of the Private Placement is, among other things, conditional upon approval by an extraordinary general meeting of AINMT to be held on 22 June 2016.The Private Placement is expected to be registered with the Norwegian Registry of Business Enterprises on or about 24 June 2016, following which the new shares will be tradable at the OTC market in Oslo, Norway.Following completion of the Private Placement, AINMT will have issued 31,402,271 shares in total, and AINMT Holdings AB will have issued 109,362,335 shares in total, of which AINMT will own approximately 28.7%, disregarding any dilution upon exercise of warrants issued by AINMT Holdings AB. Notification of allotment and payment instructions will be sent to the applicants on or about 20 June 2016.The Board of AINMT has passed a resolution to work towards a listing on Oslo Stock Exchange or Oslo Axess, or another regulated market, within 12 months.DNB Markets and Pareto Securities are acting as joint managers in connection with the private placement. For further information, please contact:InvestorsJohan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000MediaEndre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no



 

AINMT AS - News of share issue - 20 June 2016.pdf




AINMT AS - Status of bookbuilding (AINMT)
Company news
2016-06-17 12:51:41


NOT FOR DISTRIBUTION OR RELEASE, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, IN OR INTO THE UNITED STATES, CANADA, AUSTRALIA, HONG KONG OR JAPAN OR ANY OTHER JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE DISTRIBUTION OR RELEASE WOULD BE UNLAWFUL Reference is made to the press release from AINMT AS ("AINMT" or the "Company") dated 6 June 2016 regarding the private placement. Status of the ongoing bookbuilding process is that the book is covered within the range of shares offered. Based on the current status the indicative offer price is NOK 65 per share. The bookbuilding period runs until 16:30 CET today, 17 June 2016. DNB Markets and Pareto Securities are acting as managers in connection with the private placement.For further information, please contact:Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000



 
 




AINMT AS - EGM notice (private placement of shares)
Company news
2016-06-15 21:13:02


Oslo, 15 June 2016 - The board of directors hereby convenes an extraordinary general meeting (EGM) in AINMT AS to be held on Wednesday 22 June at 1000 hours (CET) at Advokatfirmaet BA-HR DA's premises at Tjuvholmen allé 16, 0252 Oslo.Please find attached the full EGM notice. For further information, please contact:Johan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000



 

AINMT AS - Notice for EGM 2016.06.22.pdf




AINMT AS - Contemplated private placement (AINMT)
Company news
2016-06-06 07:18:35


NOT FOR RELEASE, PUBLICATION OR DISTRIBUTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, IN AUSTRALIA, CANADA, JAPAN OR THE UNITED STATES.AINMT AS: Contemplated private placementOslo, 6 June 2016 - AINMT AS is contemplating a private placement of new shares with the objective of raising gross proceeds of USD 50 - 70 million. The Board has passed a resolution to work for a listing on Oslo Børs or Oslo Axess, or other regulated market, within 12 months. The decision to conduct a private placement is partly driven by the strong sales momentum in AINMT's Norwegian operation, in addition to increased international ambitions.Business updateAINMT's fully owned operations run under the brand Ice.net has recently gained a much stronger momentum in subscriber sales than expected. In April and May alone, ice.net's gross subscriber sales totalled more than 50,000. Ice.net will continue to expand its distribution network going forward and focus on disruptive product offerings to subscribers. Ice will also migrate all smartphone customers to its own state-of-the-art 4G network in 2H 2016, enabling the company to reap the benefits of on-net traffic.In Indonesia, the telecommunication regulatory body, BRTI, has recently stated publicly that it will recommend adopting tech neutrality for the 450 MHz frequency, which AINMT partly owns through local partner Sampoerna Telekomunikasi Indonesia (STI). Tech neutrality means AINMT will be able to build a 4G network in Indonesia. The tech neutrality-decision is pending formal government approval. Following such approval, AINMT expects network swap and commercial launch 4G services in 2H 2016/1Q 2017. In the Philippines, AINMT together with its local partners are actively working to secure regulatory approval for additional spectrum. A trial network was launched in April 2016, and AINMT expects network roll-out and commercial launch in 2H 2016. Private PlacementThe private placement comprises 5,850,000-8,800,000 offer shares. The final offer price will be set through a bookbuilding process. The minimum order amount is set to the NOK amount equivalent to EUR 100,000. The proceeds from the private placement will be used to capitalise further on the sales momentum in Norway and financing additional growth opportunities in Indonesia. The private placement is directed towards current shareholders and other investors, pursuant to and in compliance with applicable exemptions from the obligation to publish an offering prospectus pursuant to the Norwegian Securities Trading Act. The bookbuilding period commences at 09:00 hours (CEST) on 6 June 2016, and ends at 16:30 hours (CEST) on 17 June 2016. AINMT AS, at its sole discretion, reserves the right to shorten or extend the bookbuilding period at any time.The allocation of shares will be determined at the end of the subscription period. The final allocation will be resolved by the AINMT AS board of directors. The net proceeds from the Private Placement in AINMT AS will be utilised by the Company to subscribe for an equal amount of new shares in AINMT Holdings AB immediately upon completion of the Private Placement. Following the private placement, AINMT AS will hold 27.3-29.1% of the of the diluted Class A and B share capital in AINMT Holdings AB.The completion of the Private Placement is conditional upon (i) all necessary corporate resolutions being validly made, by the Company and AINMT Holdings AB, including without limitation (a) approval by the Board of Directors of AINMT AS of the Offer Price and allocation of Offer Shares and the approval of the Board of Directors of AINMT Holdings AB of the shares to be issued to AINMT AS, and (b) approval of the share capital increase and issue of new shares required for completion of the Private Placement by an extraordinary general meeting of the Company on or about 20 June 2016 and the approval of the shares to be issued by AINMT Holdings AB to AINMT AS in an extraordinary general meeting of AINMT Holdings AB on or about 20 June 2016; and (ii) registration of the share capital increase in the Company pursuant to the Private Placement in the Norwegian Register of Business Enterprises. The Private Placement will be cancelled if the conditions are not fulfilled, and may be cancelled by the Company in its sole discretion for any other reason. The share capital increase in AINMT AS pursuant to the private placement is expected to be registered with the Norwegian Registry of Business Enterprises on or about 24 June 2016, following which the new shares will be tradable at the OTC market in Oslo, Norway. DNB Markets and Pareto Securities have been appointed as joint managers and bookrunners for the private placement.About AINMTAINMT AS' sole purpose is to invest in shares in AINMT Holdings AB. AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV, which subsequently owns 34.1% of STI in Indonesia and 33.3% of Broadband Everywhere in The Philippines. AINMT is an international telecommunications company. Its focus is wireless data communication services, the fastest growing business segment within the telecom sector. Its unique business model, with focus on low frequency bands, allows the company to offer wireless broadband to large geographical areas while maintaining an effective network infrastructure. Low frequencies have long reach and require fewer base stations to cover large areas. This is a perfect match for rural districts, areas with varied topography and markets with underdeveloped telecommunication infrastructure. Altogether, this allows for high quality wireless data communication at a very low cost per bit. In Norway, where the company owns higher frequency bands, we also offer a full range of mobile services without having legacy networks to maintain and support.Today, AINMT has license coverage to reach 380 million people worldwide. The company is already well established in Scandinavia and has developed partnerships in Indonesia and the Philippines. It is actively pursuing international expansion opportunities, aiming to satisfy the pent-up demand for internet access and data consumption in developing countries.AINMT's ultimate majority owner is Access Industries, a privately held industrial group with long-term holdings worldwide. Its industrial focus spans four sectors: natural resources and chemicals; media and telecommunications; technology and e-commerce; and real estate.For further information, please contact:InvestorsJohan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000MediaEndre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no.



 

AINMT AS - PRESS RELEASE 2016.06.06 - FINAL.pdf




AINMT AS - Quarterly Update Q1 2016, financial update (AINMT)
Company news
2016-05-31 09:42:46


The strong sales momentum for ice.net in Norway has continued throughout the first quarter and into the second quarter. In April and May alone, ice.net's gross subscriber sales totalled more than 50 000. The growth rate is better than anticipated and AINMT will consider a share issue to further capitalise on the positive momentum. For further details, please follow this link to the quarterly reporting of AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS:https://www.ainmt.com/investor-relations/financial-reporting/The operation outside Scandinavia is to date fairly limited except for the shareholdings of 34.1% in STI in Indonesia and 33.3% in BE in The Philippines. BE launched 4G sites on the 450 MHz frequency in the first quarter. AINMT Holdings AB held USD 102 million in cash by the end of Q1 2016. The total operating expenditures in AINMT Holdings AB, excluding Scandinavia, during Q1 2016 amounted to about SEK 7.5 million



 
 




New appointment to the AINMT board
Company news
2016-04-18 09:21:55


Stockholm, 18 April 2016 - Phil Hewinson, Facebook's head of third-party mobile app monetization in Europe, Middle East and Africa, is set to join the board of directors of AINMT Holdings AB (AINMT).AINMT is the parent group of ice.net, Norway's third largest wireless network operator and provider of voice and data services, and Net1, the Swedish and Danish mobile broadband player.  AINMT also recently launched its international operations in Indonesia and the Philippines - two markets that cover 360 million people in total."We look forward to benefiting from Phil's perspectives on the mobile landscape. His expertise and perspective will be of great value to our Norwegian operations, and to our new international businesses," says Jörg Mohaupt, director on the board of AINMT and head of TMT at AINMT's majority owner, Access Industries.At Facebook, Hewinson is currently managing a team that aims to redefine the way mobile developers can monetize their apps. Prior to this, he was the partner engineer for games, working with developers across Europe to integrate their games into the Facebook platform."I'm excited to join the board of AINMT to help bring improved connectivity to people all over the world," says Phil Hewinson.Before joining Facebook in 2012, Hewinson worked at Google where he managed complex technical projects between its most strategic partners in the mobile industry, including the global technical relationship with Vodafone.  He was tech lead for Europe for the Galaxy Nexus launch and managed the global Nokia and Opera accounts. During his time at Google, Hewinson submitted 80 mobile and social inventions, 15 of which have been filed as patents. Hewinson has also worked for Microsoft and founded his own gaming company, Projected Games Ltd. He holds a first class honours degree in Computer Science from Cambridge University."Ice.net is a challenger in the Norwegian mobile communications market. The company prides itself on being different to its competitors, the traditional telecommunications players. We will continue to cultivate this profile through maintaining our data-centric approach and embracing disruptive technologies," says JD Fouchard, CEO of AINMT.Mr Hewinson will join the board of directors from the beginning of May 2016. The AINMT board of directors currently consists of Stanley Miller (chairman), Hans-Holger Albrecht, JD Fouchard, Thomas Harding, Trygve Lauvdal, Jörg Mohaupt, Ingvild Myhre and Jan Scherman.For additional information, media can please contact:Endre Aaberg JohansenTel: +47 41 610605



 
 




Endring av aksje: AINMT AS (AINMT)
Corporate actions
2016-03-29 14:46:31


Det er foretatt endringer i AINMT AS (ISIN:NO0010734742, ticker AINMT).  Aksjebeholdningen er øket fra 23 499 702 til 24 800 715.



 
 




AINMT AS - Quarterly Update Q4 2015, financial update (AINMT)
Company news
2016-02-29 17:12:59


AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV. In all material aspects the current operations of AINMT comprises of the Scandinavian operation. For further details, please follow this link to the quarterly reporting of AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS:http://www.ainmt.com/investor-relations/financial-reporting/hds/2015-2/The operation outside Scandinavia is to date fairly limited except for the shareholdings of 34.1% in STI in Indonesia and 33.3% in BE in The Philippines.



 
 




AINMT AS completes share issue
Company news
2016-02-25 14:10:00


Oslo, 25 February 2016 - AINMT AS has completed a share issue of NOK 78.1 million towards selected shareholders of AINMT Holdings AB. The share issue was authorized by AINMT AS' annual general meeting on 20 April 2015 and is related to the USD 82.5 million share issue that was completed on 22 April 2015, where shareholders in AINMT Holdings AB were promised to receive an offer to roll their shares into OTC-listed AINMT AS shares which are more liquid at identical price levels. This AINMT AS share issue is the result from this offer and is the total shares that will be rolled over. Total number of shares in AINMT Holdings AB is unchanged implying no dilution from this transaction for AINMT AS shareholders.A total of 1,301,013 new shares were issued and paid in kind with equal amount of B-shares in AINMT Holdings AB. Following the share issue, AINMT AS' share capital is NOK 24,800,715 divided into 24,800,715 registered shares each with a nominal value of NOK 1.00.AINMT AS is a holding company for owning shares in AINMT Holdings AB. AINMT AS will increase its ownership of AINMT Holdings AB to approximately 24.1 % of the share capital (23.1 % on a fully diluted basis) after this transaction. AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV.For additional information, please contact: Johan Michelsen, CFO AINMT Holdings AB and chairman of the board of AINMT ASTel: +47 410 87 000



 
 




AINMT AS - AINMT enters the Indonesian telecoms market (AINMT)
Company news
2015-12-23 08:34:53


Stockholm, 23 December 2015 - AINMT Holdings AB (AINMT) has signed a definitive agreement and all conditions required to invest in PT Sampoerna Telekomunikasi Indonesia (STI) have been lifted.STI owns nationwide frequencies in Indonesia. Together with its local partner, AINMT plans to continue to build and upgrade STIs wireless network. Indonesia is the world's fourth most populous country with a population of almost 260 million. The country consists of more than fourteen thousand islands."We remain focussed on investing in countries where the population is spread across large geographical distances. This is where our approach to utilise low frequencies can deliver best-in-class mobile data coverage and results for both AINMT and the nation's inhabitants and businesses. With this agreement and the recent transaction in the Philippines, AINMT has a footprint in Southeast Asia that covers around 360 million people. We look forward to capitalising on the excellent business opportunities this offers," says JD Fouchard, CEO of AINMT.Today, AINMT operates throughout Scandinavia on 4G-only networks in Norway (ice.net), Sweden and Denmark (Net1). On 26 November, AINMT announced that it had signed an agreement to invest in Philippine 4G player Broadband Everywhere. For additional information, please contact: Johan Michelsen, CFO AINMT Holdings AB, tel: +47 410 87 000



 
 




AINMT AS - Quarterly Update Q3 2015, financial update (AINMT)
Company news
2015-11-30 19:48:54


AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV. In all material aspects the current operations of AINMT comprises of the Scandinavian operation. For further details, please follow this link to the quarterly reporting of AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS:http://www.ainmt.com/investor-relations/financial-reporting/hds/ The operation outside Scandinavia is to date fairly limited - the total expenditures during Q3 2015, including parts of the transactions costs related to the USD 120 million subordinated loan, in AINMT Holdings AB amounted to SEK 10 million.



 
 




AINMT AS - Quarterly Update Q3 2015 (AINMT)
Company news
2015-11-30 17:00:42


On 30 September, AINMT Holdings AB announced that it had secured USD 120 million in loan funding to finance ambitious growth plans in Scandinavia and internationally - including its expansion into Indonesia and the Philippines. The loan came into effect in October.Of the above-mentioned USD 120 million, USD 40 million was provided as a perpetual callable subordinated convertible loan from AINMT AS to AINMT Holdings AB with a conversion price of SEK 79.84/share, to be funded by a corresponding loan from RASMUSSENGRUPPEN AS to AINMT AS. Throughout the quarter, AINMT's work to secure a presence in the Indonesian and Philippine wireless broadband markets has progressed well.



 
 




AINMT AS - AINMT enters the Philippines
Company news
2015-11-26 23:59:45


26 November 2015 - AINMT Holdings AB ("AINMT") is pleased to announce that is has signed a definitive agreement to invest in Philippine 4G player Broadband Everywhere ("BE"). BE owns nationwide LTE frequencies in the Philippines. AINMT and its local partner will invest funds to build a complementary 4G network providing wireless internet access for business and residential customers as well as the M2M market.The Philippines has a population of approximately 100 million people and consists of 7,107 islands with a total land area of 300,000 square kilometers. "This is the first step of AINMT's expansion plans outside Scandinavia. It opens up a significant market for us. AINMT's approach of covering large areas through low frequencies is ideally suited for a market such as the Philippines. Further, our 4G-only strategy will allow us to deliver a very good service to underserved areas," says JD Fouchard, CEO of AINMT. All condition precedents for this transaction have been met and funding will occur within next few days.Today, AINMT operates throughout Scandinavia on 4G-only networks in Norway (ice.net), Sweden and Denmark (Net1). ENDS For additional information, please contact:Johan Michelsen, CFO AINMT Holdings ABTel: +47 410 87 000



 
 




AINMT - Minutes from general meeting
Company news
2015-10-30 17:08:38


30 October 2015 - The extraordinary general meetings in AINMT AS and AINMT Holdings AB have approved new convertible loans.On 30 September 2015, AINMT AS announced that it had secured USD 120 million in subordinated PIK loan funding to finance ambitious growth plans in Scandinavia and internationally. The new subordinated PIK loan with par value USD 80 million maturing in 2030 was disbursed to AINMT Holdings AB early October and USD 50 million was subsequently injected as new equity capital in AINMT Scandinavia AS. The additional USD 40 million of subordinated capital committed will be provided as a perpetual callable subordinated convertible loan from AINMT AS to AINMT Holdings AB with a conversion price of SEK 79.84/share, to be funded by a corresponding loan from RASMUSSENGRUPPEN AS to AINMT AS.AINMT AS and AINMT Holdings AB have today, on 30 October 2015, completed extraordinary general meetings that have approved such financing.  Approximately 73.6% of the shares in AINMT AS were represented at the AINMT AS general meeting. 100% of the shares in AINMT Holdings AB were represented at the AINMT Holdings AB general meeting. All resolutions were unanimous.  The minutes from the extraordinary general meeting in AINMT AS are attached hereto.AINMT AS was established in March 2015 as a holding company for owning shares in AINMT Holdings AB and currently owns approximately 22.9 % of the share capital (22.1 % on a fully diluted basis) in AINMT Holdings AB. RASMUSSENGRUPPEN AS is the holder of approximately 29.5 % of the shares in AINMT AS.  AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV.For additional information, please contact: Johan Michelsen, CFO AINMT Holdings AB and chairman of the board of AINMT ASTel: +47 410 87 000



 

AINMT AS - EGM minutes 2015.10.30.pdf




AINMT AS calls for general meeting
Company news
2015-10-23 22:07:06


On 30 September 2015 AINMT Holdings AB announced that it had secured USD 120 million in subordinated PIK loan funding to finance ambitious growth plans in Scandinavia and internationally. The new subordinated PIK loan with par value USD 80 million maturing in 2030 was disbursed to AINMT Holdings AB early October and USD 50 million was subsequently injected as new equity capital in AINMT Scandinavia AS. The additional USD 40 million of subordinated capital committed is currently expected to be provided as a subordinated perpetual callable convertible loan from AINMT AS to AINMT Holdings AB, to be funded by a corresponding convertible loan from RASMUSSENGRUPPEN AS to AINMT AS.AINMT AS was established in March 2015 as a holding company for owning shares in AINMT Holdings AB and currently owns app. 22,6 % of the share capital in AINMT Holdings AB. RASMUSSENGRUPPEN AS is the holder of app. 29,5 % of the shares in AINMT AS.AINMT AS has scheduled a general meeting on 30 October 2015 to approve such financing from RASMUSSENGRUPPEN AS. The notice for the general meeting in AINMT AS is available at the company's website.AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV. For further information, please contact: Johan Michelsen, CFO AINMT Holdings AB and chairman of the board of AINMT ASTel: +47 410 87 000



 

AINMT AS - EGM Notice, 23 October 2015.pdf




AINMT Holdings AB secures additional funding for growth plans
Company news
2015-09-30 08:54:11


30 September 2015 - AINMT Holdings AB secures USD 120 million in PIK loan funding to finance ambitious growth plans in Scandinavia and internationally - including the expansion into Indonesia and the Philippines. USD 50 million of the proceeds will be injected as equity into AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS.A Large independent asset management group has committed to invest in a new subordinated loan with par value USD 80 million maturing in 2030 with payment-in-kind flexibility for interest coupons ("PIK loan"). The PIK-loan will be issued at 94.5% of par value and bear a cash interest coupon of 9.9% p.a. with a 2 percentage point step-up from year five, and with an additional 0.6 percentage points if the PIK facility is utilised. AINMT Holdings AB's ultimate majority owner, Access Industries, has guaranteed an additional USD 40 million of subordinated capital to be raised within the next month, bringing the total amount of new funding to USD 120 million. AINMT Holdings AB may call on the PIK-loan at any given time, at agreed premiums. The long term loan with PIK-structure provides greater flexibility compared to traditional bond financing."We are very satisfied with the additional funds that enable us to pursue aggressive growth, without limiting our options for additional financing going forward. At the same time, we avoid issuing additional shares at the current share price levels," says JD Fouchard, CEO of AINMT Holdings AB.AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV.For additional information, please contact: Johan Michelsen, CFO AINMT Holdings ABTel: +47 410 87 000



 
 




AINMT AS - Quarterly Update Q2 2015 (AINMT)
Company news
2015-08-31 15:16:33


On 29 April 2015, AINMT AS successfully completed a share issue of USD 82.5 million. The majority of the proceeds were invested in newly issued shares in AINMT Holdings AB.On April 1 2015 the initial phase to acquire Tele2's mobile network infrastructure in Norway came into effect. In June, AINMT's Norwegian operation launched its consumer smartphone proposition under the brand ice.net and rebranded Network Norway to ice.net. AINMT's network upgrade throughout Scandinavia is planned to be finalised during October 2015.AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV. In all material aspects the current operations of AINMT comprises of the Scandinavian operation. For further details, please follow this link to the quarterly reporting of AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS:http://www.ainmt.com/start/investor-relations/financial-reporting/HDS/The operation outside Scandinavia is to date fairly limited. The total operating expenditures in AINMT Holdings AB, excluding Scandinavia, during Q2 2015 amounted to SEK 1.6 million.



 
 




AINMT AS - New board members in AINMT Holdings AB (AINMT)
Company news
2015-07-03 12:52:58


Hans-Holger Albrecht and Trygve Lauvdal have been elected onto the Board of Directors of AINMT Holdings AB."Hans-Holger and Trygve bring valuable experience and know-how from the international and Norwegian markets. We are very pleased that they have accepted their roles," says, Jörg Mohaupt, a non-executive director of AINMT Holdings AB and Head of Media and Telecoms at AINMT's majority shareholder, Access Industries.For furhter details, please follow this link:http://www.ainmt.com/start/investor-relations/press-releases/ The board of AINMT AS consists of Johan Michelsen (chairman), Jörg Mohaupt and Trygve Lauvdal.




http://www.ainmt.com
 




AINMT AS - Quarterly Update Q1 2015 (AINMT)
Company news
2015-05-29 14:39:20


On 29 April 2015, AINMT AS successfully completed a share issue of USD 82.5 million towards selected institutional and professional investors. The proceeds from the share issue, less approximately NOK 5 million retained by AINMT AS to cover on-going expenses, were immediately invested in newly issued shares in AINMT Holdings AB.AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV. In all material aspects the current operations of AINMT comprises of the Scandinavian operation. For further details please follow this link to the quarterly reporting of AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS:http://www.ainmt.com/start/investor-relations/financial-reporting/HDS/The operation outside Scandinavia is to date fairly limited. The total operating expenditures in AINMT Holdings AB, excluding Scandinavia, during Q1 2015 amounted to just about SEK 1 million.




http://www.ainmt.com
 




AINMT: AINMT AS is registered on the NOTC-list
Company news
2015-04-30 09:40:47


AINMT AS is registered on the NOTC-list as of 30 April with ticker code AINMT.  The company has issued 23,499,702 shares each with a par value NOK 1.00, all of which are registered in the VPS with ISIN code NO 001 0734742.  Based on the issue price of USD 5.5 (equivalent to NOK 43.48 /share 21 April 2015), the market capitalization is USD 129,248,361 (equivalent to NOK 1,021,798,768). The company has entered into an agreement whereby it will be able to use the NOTC reporting system as from 30 April 2015.AINMT AS is an investment company with an interest in the parent company of ice.net, a fully fledged mobile network operator in Norway focussing on the smartphone, mobile broadband and M2M markets and Net1 in Sweden and Denmark where it retains a leading position with regards to coverage. The purpose of the equity issue is to invest the proceeds from the share issue into AINMT Holdings AB. It is expected that AINMT Holdings AB will use the gross proceeds raised in the Private Placement to fund its international expansion into South East Asia and for general corporate purposes. The first leg of the international expansion is planned to be a roll-out of mobile data networks in Indonesia and the Philippines, in cooperation with local partners.



 
 






 


AINMT AS - Contemplated private placement































| Menu




          					About AINMT
				

          					Investor Relations
				

          					News & Media
				

          					Norway
				

          					Sweden & Denmark
				

          					International
				






AINMT | Wireless broadband




Back to AINMT | Wireless broadband


AINMT AS - Contemplated private placement
6 June 2016
Oslo, 6 June 2016 - AINMT AS is contemplating a private placement of new shares with the objective of raising gross proceeds of USD 50 - 70 million. The Board has passed a resolution to work for a listing on Oslo Børs or Oslo Axess, or other regulated market, within 12 months. The decision to conduct a private placement is partly driven by the strong sales momentum in AINMT's Norwegian operation, in addition to increased international ambitions. NOT FOR RELEASE, PUBLICATION OR DISTRIBUTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, IN AUSTRALIA, CANADA, JAPAN OR THE UNITED STATES.Business updateAINMT's fully owned operations run under the brand Ice.net has recently gained a much stronger momentum in subscriber sales than expected. In April and May alone, ice.net's gross subscriber sales totalled more than 50,000. Ice.net will continue to expand its distribution network going forward and focus on disruptive product offerings to subscribers. Ice will also migrate all smartphone customers to its own state-of-the-art 4G network in 2H 2016, enabling the company to reap the benefits of on-net traffic.In Indonesia, the telecommunication regulatory body, BRTI, has recently stated publicly that it will recommend adopting tech neutrality for the 450 MHz frequency, which AINMT partly owns through local partner Sampoerna Telekomunikasi Indonesia (STI). Tech neutrality means AINMT will be able to build a 4G network in Indonesia. The tech neutrality-decision is pending formal government approval. Following such approval, AINMT expects network swap and commercial launch 4G services in 2H 2016/1Q 2017.In the Philippines, AINMT together with its local partners are actively working to secure regulatory approval for additional spectrum. A trial network was launched in April 2016, and AINMT expects network roll-out and commercial launch in 2H 2016.Private PlacementThe private placement comprises 5,850,000-8,800,000 offer shares. The final offer price will be set through a bookbuilding process. The minimum order amount is set to the NOK amount equivalent to EUR 100,000. The proceeds from the private placement will be used to capitalise further on the sales momentum in Norway and financing additional growth opportunities in Indonesia. The private placement is directed towards current shareholders and other investors, pursuant to and in compliance with applicable exemptions from the obligation to publish an offering prospectus pursuant to the Norwegian Securities Trading Act. The bookbuilding period commences at 09:00 hours (CEST) on 6 June 2016, and ends at 16:30 hours (CEST) on 17 June 2016. AINMT AS, at its sole discretion, reserves the right to shorten or extend the bookbuilding period at any time.The allocation of shares will be determined at the end of the subscription period. The final allocation will be resolved by the AINMT AS board of directors. The net proceeds from the Private Placement in AINMT AS will be utilised by the Company to subscribe for an equal amount of new shares in AINMT Holdings AB immediately upon completion of the Private Placement. Following the private placement, AINMT AS will hold 27.3-29.1% of the of the diluted Class A and B share capital in AINMT Holdings AB.The completion of the Private Placement is conditional upon (i) all necessary corporate resolutions being validly made, by the Company and AINMT Holdings AB, including without limitation (a) approval by the Board of Directors of AINMT AS of the Offer Price and allocation of Offer Shares and the approval of the Board of Directors of AINMT Holdings AB of the shares to be issued to AINMT AS, and (b) approval of the share capital increase and issue of new shares required for completion of the Private Placement by an extraordinary general meeting of the Company on or about 20 June 2016 and the approval of the shares to be issued by AINMT Holdings AB to AINMT AS in an extraordinary general meeting of AINMT Holdings AB on or about 20 June 2016; and (ii) registration of the share capital increase in the Company pursuant to the Private Placement in the Norwegian Register of Business Enterprises. The Private Placement will be cancelled if the conditions are not fulfilled, and may be cancelled by the Company in its sole discretion for any other reason. The share capital increase in AINMT AS pursuant to the private placement is expected to be registered with the Norwegian Registry of Business Enterprises on or about 24 June 2016, following which the new shares will be tradable at the OTC market in Oslo, Norway.DNB Markets and Pareto Securities have been appointed as joint managers and bookrunners for the private placement.About AINMTAINMT AS' sole purpose is to invest in shares in AINMT Holdings AB. AINMT Holdings AB owns 100% of the shares in AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AS and AINMT International Holdings BV, which subsequently owns 34.1% of STI in Indonesia and 33.3% of Broadband Everywhere in The Philippines. AINMT is an international telecommunications company. Its focus is wireless data communication services, the fastest growing business segment within the telecom sector. Its unique business model, with focus on low frequency bands, allows the company to offer wireless broadband to large geographical areas while maintaining an effective network infrastructure. Low frequencies have long reach and require fewer base stations to cover large areas. This is a perfect match for rural districts, areas with varied topography and markets with underdeveloped telecommunication infrastructure. Altogether, this allows for high quality wireless data communication at a very low cost per bit. In Norway, where the company owns higher frequency bands, we also offer a full range of mobile services without having legacy networks to maintain and support.Today, AINMT has license coverage to reach 380 million people worldwide. The company is already well established in Scandinavia and has developed partnerships in Indonesia and the Philippines. It is actively pursuing international expansion opportunities, aiming to satisfy the pent-up demand for internet access and data consumption in developing countries.AINMT's ultimate majority owner is Access Industries, a privately held industrial group with long-term holdings worldwide. Its industrial focus spans four sectors: natural resources and chemicals; media and telecommunications; technology and e-commerce; and real estate.For further information, please contact:InvestorsJohan Michelsen, CFO, AINMT Holdings AB, +47 410 87 000+47 410 87 000MediaEndre Aaberg Johansen, Corporate Communications AS, tel: +47 41 61 06 05, email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no.

Back to AINMT | Wireless broadband







For media enquiries to AINMT, please contact:Endre Aaberg Johansen - Corporate CommunicationsTel: +47 41 61 06 05Email: endre.johansen@corpcom.no





© 2017 AINMT Holdings AB


          					Terms of Use
				

          					Privacy Policy
				



Contact Us
info@ainmt.com


Receive our updates



Submit













	AINMT plans USD 50-70 mln private placement in Oslo - Telecompaper











































tp:news
tp:research
tp:events


                    Edition: International


Nederlands







Log in


Register


Products


0
Article Binder







        Edition:
    

International


Nederlands




Log in



Article Binder
0



Products




Telecompaper


 Loading...























0






Sections
Subscriptions








Home
Wireless
Broadband
:
Video
:
General
:
IT
:
Industry Resources
:
Jobs
:
Calendar
Subscriptions





Wireless










AINMT plans USD 50-70 mln private placement in Oslo
Monday 6 June 2016 | 12:59 CET  | News



					    AINMT AS, part of Ukrainian-born US billionaire Len Blavatnik's Access Industries holding company, said it is contemplating a private placement of new shares with the aim of raising gross proceeds of USD 50 million to USD 70 million. The board has passed a resolution to work towards a listing on the Oslo Bors or Oslo Axess, or other regulated market, within twelve months. The decision is partly driven by the strong sales momentum in AINMT's Norwegian operation, in addition to increased international ambitions.

				    






Thank you for visiting Telecompaper
We hope you've enjoyed your free articles. Sign up below to get access to the rest of this article and all the telecom news you need.




Register free and gain access to even more articles from Telecompaper. Register here


Subscribe and get unlimited access to Telecompaper’s full coverage, with a customised choice of news, commentary, research and alerts.


Subscriptions



Already registered?


Remember me



















Free Headlines in your E-mail

Every day we send out a free e-mail with the most important headlines of the last 24 hours.
            
        




Subscribe now






Categories:
Mobile & Wireless


Companies:

ICE
							
								 /  Ice.net
							
								 /  Net1
							
								 /  Telekomunikasi Indonesia



Countries:
Indonesia / Norway / Philippines



::: add a comment


				This article is part of dossier
				
						LTE

::: more









Add comment













Register an account with Telecompaper








We welcome comments that add value to the discussion. We attempt to block comments that use offensive language or appear to be spam, and our editors frequently review the comments to ensure they are appropriate. If you see a comment that you believe is inappropriate to the discussion, you can bring it to our attention by using the report abuse links. As the comments are written and submitted by visitors of the Telecompaper website, they in no way represent the opinion of Telecompaper.







Related










AINMT welcomes Indonesian tech neutrality for 450 MHz band



Published 18 Nov 2016 13:15 CET | Indonesia





                                                    AINMT Holding said the Indonesian authorities have formally approved the adoption of technical neutrality for the country's 450 ...

















Philippines' Broadband Everywhere gets more 450 MHz spectrum



Published 14 Nov 2016 12:17 CET | Philippines





                                                    AINMT Holding said that its subsidiary in the Philippines, Broadband Everywhere (BE), has acquired more, nationwide spectrum in ...

















Ice Norway runs half-price broadband offer until 15 October



Published 04 Oct 2016 13:44 CET | Norway





                                                    Ice Norway, which belongs to AINMT Scandinavia, in turn part of Access Industries, is repeating the six-month half-price ...

















AINMT Scandinavia gets shareholder loan to invest in Norway



Published 09 Aug 2016 11:59 CET | Norway





                                                    Following the recent share issue at AINMT AS and AINMT Holdings AB, the latter has granted a subordinated shareholder loan to ...

















AINMT EGM approves private share placement



Published 23 Jun 2016 12:31 CET | Norway





                                                    AINMT AS said shareholders at its extraordinary general meeting (EGM) on 22 June unanimously approved the issuance of 6.6 million ...

















AINMT raises NOK 429 mln in private share placement



Published 20 Jun 2016 12:11 CET | Norway





                                                    AINMT AS said it has successfully placed 6,601,556 shares privately with Norwegian and international institutional and ...

















AINMT to hold EGM on 22 June to vote on share placement



Published 16 Jun 2016 13:29 CET | Norway





                                                    AINMT AS, part of Ukrainian-born US billionaire Len Blavatnik's Access Industries holding company, has announced an Extraordinary ...

















Ice.net signs sales agreement with Expert electronics chain



Published 16 Jun 2016 13:01 CET | Norway





                                                    Ice.net, part of AINMT Scandinavia and belonging to Ukrainian-born US billionaire Len Blavatnik's Access Industries, has signed ...

















Net1 offers month's free internet, discounted router



Published 10 Jun 2016 22:13 CET | Sweden





                                                    Swedish company wireless internet company Net1 is running a special offer for the summer holidays. Net1 belongs to AINMT, which ...

















AINMT Scandinavia lifts Q1 sales but posts negative EBITDA



Published 01 Jun 2016 15:29 CET | Denmark





                                                    AINMT Scandinavia, part of Ukrainian-born American billionaire Len Blavatnik's Access Industries group, said that revenue in the ...

















Net1 offers holiday router at reduced price



Published 23 Mar 2016 12:33 CET | Sweden





                                                    Swedish wireless ISP Net1, part of AINMT Holdings, said that customers can take their internet connection with them when they go ...

















AINMT enters Indonesia by investing in Sampoerna



Published 23 Dec 2015 12:08 CET | Indonesia





                                                    AINMT Holdings, part of Ukrainian-American billionaire Len Blavatnik's Access Industries group, has signed a definitive agreement ...

















AINMT invests in Broadband Everywhere in Philippines



Published 27 Nov 2015 12:57 CET | Philippines





                                                    AINMT Holdings said that is has signed a definitive agreement to invest in Philippine 4G player Broadband Everywhere (BE). BE ...

















AINMT to expand in Scandinavia, Indonesia, Philippines



Published 06 Oct 2015 11:46 CET | Denmark





                                                    AINMT Holdings AB, part of Ukrainian-American billionaire Len Blavatnik's Access Industries group, has secured a USD 120 million ...
















Wireless





16:06


ZTE, Singtel complete live deployment of 2.6GHz Massive MIMO network 



                            Singapore | News






15:53


Apple, Samsung grow share of US smartphone market in Q2



                            United States | News






15:44


SIA's Jiffy m-payment app available in Italian stores



                            Italy | News






16:04


Phablet sales to boost smartphone revenue in Germany in 2017



                            Germany | News






15:01


Smartphone shipments to China to be higher in H2 vs H1



                            China | News






14:50


Sharp to launch full screen smartphone in Beijing



                            China | News






16:06


T-Mobile Czech Republic Q2 revenue lifts 6 percent



                            Czech Republic | News






14:30


Dutch ministry wants more space in 3.5 GHz band for 5G



                            Netherlands | News






13:59


Xiaomi outsells Fitbit and Apple to lead wearables market in Q2



                            World | News






14:00


Cambium launches wireless broadband EPMP bridge-in-a-box



                            World | News







::: more wireless
















Related Info





AINMT welcomes Indonesian tech neutrality for 450 MHz band



									18 Nov 2016 | Indonesia | News








Philippines' Broadband Everywhere gets more 450 MHz spectrum



									14 Nov 2016 | Philippines | News








Ice Norway runs half-price broadband offer until 15 October



									4 Oct 2016 | Norway | News








AINMT Scandinavia gets shareholder loan to invest in Norway



									9 Aug 2016 | Norway | News








AINMT EGM approves private share placement



									23 Jun 2016 | Norway | News








AINMT raises NOK 429 mln in private share placement



									20 Jun 2016 | Norway | News








AINMT to hold EGM on 22 June to vote on share placement



									16 Jun 2016 | Norway | News








Ice.net signs sales agreement with Expert electronics chain



									16 Jun 2016 | Norway | News








Net1 offers month's free internet, discounted router



									10 Jun 2016 | Sweden | News








AINMT Scandinavia lifts Q1 sales but posts negative EBITDA



									1 Jun 2016 | Denmark | News








Net1 offers holiday router at reduced price



									23 Mar 2016 | Sweden | News








AINMT enters Indonesia by investing in Sampoerna



									23 Dec 2015 | Indonesia | News








AINMT invests in Broadband Everywhere in Philippines



									27 Nov 2015 | Philippines | News








AINMT to expand in Scandinavia, Indonesia, Philippines



									6 Oct 2015 | Denmark | News






















Triple play households drop to 60.5% of all multiplay households



Netherlands  |  2017Q1












::: more facts & figures




Market Commentary


31 Jul


	                    Can 'Game of Thrones' exclusive give Ziggo a boost?
	                





24 Jul


	                    Dutch pay-TV providers under threat as broadcasters launch OTT TV platform
	                





3 Jul


	                    International call prices don't need regulating
	                





19 Jun


	                    Did Tele2 NL just put its fixed-line consumer unit up for sale?
	                





12 Jun


	                    Roam like home: not so simple as hoped
	                




::: more market commentary



Background Articles


1 Aug


	                    Amazon Q2: expansion dampens cash position but new peak expected in Q4
	                





31 Jul


	                    Google brings Android Pay to more markets, adds new partners
	                





31 Jul


	                    KPN Q2 review: bundling effect positive but slowing in Consumer, negative in Business
	                





24 Jul


	                    Dutch consumers satisfied with phones, battery satisfaction improving
	                





21 Jul


	                    Sub-Saharan Africa accounted for half of global mobile money deployments in 2016
	                




::: more background articles




Calendar
          /  
        Industry Events





03 Aug


Ceva Q2 2017






03 Aug


CyrusOne Q2 2017






03 Aug


Sonus Networks Q2 2017






03 Aug


Cognizant Q2 2017






03 Aug


CK Hutchison Q2 2017






03 Aug


OTE Q2 2017






03 Aug


Windstream Q2 2017






03 Aug


Immersion Q2 2017






03 Aug


RealNetworks Q2 2017






03 Aug


Internap Q2 2017






03 Aug


NeoPhotonics Q2 2017






03 Aug


Cogent Communications Q2 2017






03 Aug


Tivo Q2 2017






03 Aug


MTN Q2 2017






03 Aug


Motorola Solutions Q2 2017






03 Aug


Ubiquiti Networks fiscal Q4






03 Aug


Boingo Wireless Q2 2017






03 Aug


BCE Q2 2017






03 Aug


Dish Network Q2 2017






03 Aug


Edgeware Q2 2017






03 Aug


Deutsche Telekom Q2 2017






03 Aug


Veon Q2 2017






03 Aug


Infinera Q2 2017






03 Aug


Consolidated Communications Q2 2017






03 Aug


Inmarsat Q2 2017






03 Aug


Globalstar Q2 2017






03 Aug


FCC meeting






04 Aug


Cincinnati Bell Q2 2017






04 Aug


TDS/U.S. Cellular Q2 2017






04 Aug


NTT fiscal Q1




::: More Calendar Items





24 Aug


HetNet & Small Cells India Congress 






29 Aug


Connected Health Summit: Engaging Consumers






06 Sep


NPF CEE & Regtech Leaders Forum






15 Sep


Future Packet Transport Networks 2017 






18 Sep


Telecoms World Middle East 2017






20 Sep


SD-WAN Summit 2017 2nd Edition






20 Sep


Wireless China Industry Summit






20 Sep


NigeriaCom






25 Sep


Connected Fleeds USA 2017






25 Sep


11th Telecoms Energy Efficiency Forum: EMEA






25 Sep


Submarine Networks World 2017






26 Sep


Carriers World & IPX Summit 2017






27 Sep


Service Delivery Innovation Summit






10 Oct


7th Annual Customer Experience Loyalty & Retention Summit






11 Oct


Digital TV CEE






19 Oct


5G Innovation Summit






23 Oct


Intelligent Cities Exhibition & Conference






24 Oct


Broadband World Forum 






24 Oct


Telco Data Analytics Europe 






31 Oct


Total Telecom Congress






01 Nov


CONNECTIONS™ Europe






06 Nov


TU-Automotive Europe 2017






07 Nov


AfricaCom






10 Nov


Connected Europe 2017






29 Nov


IoT Tech Expo North America 2017






29 Nov


Open Mobile Summit 






20 Feb


CESIS 2018






19 Mar


Telecoms World Asia 2018






10 Apr


Gigabit Access 2018




::: More Industry Events








                Twitter
            

::: follow Telecompaper on Twitter
::: follow





                Facebook
            

::: like Telecompaper on Facebook
::: like





                LinkedIn
            

::: connect with Telecompaper on LinkedIn
::: connect





                    Free Headlines
                

::: subscribe now






















Telecompaper
                    



                        We have been keeping professionals in the telecoms industry up-to-date since 2000. Telecompaper is a well respected, independent research and publishing company focussed on the telecommunications industry.
                    

tp:news
tp:research
tp:events




This Site
                    


My account
Alerts
Subscriptions
Products
iPhone app
Syndication
FAQ / Help
Advertise
Press
Contact
Jobs
Industry events



Contact Information
                    



Corporate HQ
                        Standerdmolen 20-III
                        3995 AA Houten
                        The Netherlands


                        Phone: +31 30 6349600
                        Fax: +31 30 6349699




Legal Information
                    


© 2000 - 2017 Telecom.paper BV. All rights reserved.
                    Telecompaper is a trademark of Telecom.paper BV. No part of this site can be reproduced without 
                    the expressed permission of Telecom.paper BV. Our General Terms and Conditions can be found here.

Privacy Policy
Cookie Statement
Terms and Conditions














        OK
    

        For optimum operation, this website makes use of cookies. For more information click here.
    



















AINMT Company Profile | Matchdeck






























Products


Corporate Search


Company Monitor


Trade Connect




Solutions


Specialist Company Research


Data Enrichment & maintenance


Monitoring


Trade Matching


Identity and Trust


Relationship Mapping




Use Cases


Due Dilligence


Market Places


Recruitment


Information Services


Government Trade




Our Technology


Data Architecture


AI Web Extraction Engine


Technology Stack


Orchestrate


Knowledge Graph


Compute


Micro-services


Web Services


Engineering






Company


About Us


Key Assets


Why Linked Data


Leadership


Contact us


Give us feedback


Submit a website




Get API access




Directories


Sectors


Regions


Business Opportunities


Trending




Search / Browse



Corporate Search




Browse Companies




Browse Projects




All projects




Projects by Region




Projects by Sector











Sign up / Login








Menu


×
Close





Menu


×
Close








Link copied to clipboard!

×












Find another company:
































AINMT






Also known as:


AINMT AS, AINMT Holdings, AINMT Holdings AB, AINMT International, AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AB






Site checked


28 days ago




Last website update detected


28 days ago
























Description


Recent changes


Contact info


Business Relations


Additional info


Employees


Linked Domains









Short description




AINMT is an international telecommunications company. Its focus is wireless data communication services, the fastest growing business segment within the telecom sector. Its unique business model, with focus on low frequency bands, allows the company to offer wireless broadband to large geographical areas while maintaining an effective network infrastructure...
 Low frequencies have long reach and require fewer base stations to cover large areas. This is a perfect match for rural districts, areas with varied topography and markets with underdeveloped telecommunication infrastructure. Altogether, this allows for high quality wireless data communication at a very low cost per bit. In Norway, where the company owns higher frequency bands, we also offer a full range of mobile services without having legacy networks to maintain and support.














Contact Info





Access AINMT's contact information


Contact Information Summary



Website


www.ainmt.com




Emails


1











EMPLOYEES AT AINMT





Get instant access to AINMT’s employee data with biographies and contact information

Employee Data Summary



Senior Employees


11




Other Employees


8




Employee Biographies


19




Former employees


5











Additional info







ID:


17802780/44




Matchdeck number:


9911533




Also known as:


AINMT AS, AINMT Holdings, AINMT Holdings AB, AINMT International, AINMT Scandinavia Holdings AB




Domain / Website Status


OK




Category


Company








Business Relations




Associated Investors


1










Linked Domains





1
Linked domains










Changes to AINMT





Show me changes in the last

1M | 3M | 6M | 9M | 12M
|
All



105 changes since 15 Feb, 2014





Changes



Get instant access to AINMT change data, covering everything from employee changes to web page changes.








Integer


Pellentesque


Aenean


Lorem ipsum


Aenean


Lorem ipsum.





Integer posuere erat a ante venenatis dapibus posuere velit aliquet.


Pellentesque ornare sem lacinia quam venenatis vestibulum.


Aenean eu leo quam.


Lorem ipsum dolor sit amet.


Aenean eu.


Lorem ipsum.




Magna Sollicitudin


Consectetur Sit Magna


Aenean eu leo quam.


Adipiscing Porta


Condimentum Ullamcorper.


Nibh Ligula.




Magna Sollicitudin


Consectetur leo quam.


Aenean eu  Sit Magna


Adipiscing Porta


Condimentum


Nibh Ligula  Ullamcorper.




Magna Sollicitudin


Consectetur Sit Magna


Aenean eu leo quam.


Adipiscing Porta


Condimentum Ullamcorper.


Nibh Ligula.













Want us to email you when anything at AINMT changes?
Get alerts when we detect key change events including changes to employees, contact information, partners and much more.
Get an alert when AINMT changes

Want to find another company?
Search our database of 16M companies worldwide
Find another company













